Citation: Guerreschi, A.;
Díaz López, F.J. A Bibliometric
Analysis on Cooperatives in Circular
Economy and Eco-Innovation
Studies. Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595.
https://doi.org/10.3390/su152115595
Academic Editors: Davide
Settembre-Blundo and Giovanni
De Feo
Received: 30 June 2023
Revised: 25 October 2023
Accepted: 30 October 2023
Published: 3 November 2023
Copyright:
© 2023 by the authors.
Licensee MDPI, Basel, Switzerland.
This article is an open access article
distributed
under
the
terms
and
conditions of the Creative Commons
Attribution (CC BY) license (https://
creativecommons.org/licenses/by/
4.0/).
sustainability
Article
A Bibliometric Analysis on Cooperatives in Circular Economy
and Eco-Innovation Studies
Asia Guerreschi 1,2,3,*
and Fernando J. Díaz López 3,4,5
1
Department of Economics & Management, University of Ferrara, 44121 Ferrara, Italy
2
Department of Humanities, University of Ferrara, 44121 Ferrara, Italy
3
SEEDS, University of Ferrara, 44121 Ferrara, Italy; fernando.diaz-lopez@climate-kic.org
4
Transitions Hub, EIT Climate KIC, 75013 Paris, France
5
Department of Industrial Engineering, Stellenbosch University, Stellenbosch 7602, South Africa
*
Correspondence: grrsai@unife.it
Abstract: Cooperatives address societal challenges embracing values beyond mere proﬁt-oriented
production. Considering the ongoing shift to achieve efﬁcient use of resources and increased circular-
ity, cooperatives should be better equipped to incorporate circular economy (CE) and eco-innovation
(EI) into their strategies (compared to regular enterprises). This paper reviews the scholarly literature
focusing on the application of CE and EI within cooperative studies with the aim to understand the
relationships between these topics, identify the existing scholarly communities, and to observe salient
research themes. This study reﬁned the method of van den Hoven and Rubalcaba (2016) to conduct
a two-step bibliographic review of documents: a thematic analysis of citation data from Scopus
(including a manual review of 16 papers) was followed by a bibliometric analysis of 101 documents
from Web of Science (using R-Studio’s Biblioshiny). Our results identiﬁed three intellectual clusters
of cooperative studies focusing on the downstream of CE: (1) industrial ecology; (2) recycling; and
(3) waste management. Our study also revealed an emerging scholarly ﬁeld focused on cooperatives
and CE, and with little attention to EI. These ﬁndings aim at catalyzing the integration of cooperatives
more effectively into scholarly discussions, suggesting that environmental sustainability should be
recognized as an additional principle of the cooperative identity—providing a wider perspective that
enhances interest in the research of these topics and their interconnections.
Keywords: cooperatives; cooperative enterprise; circular economy; eco-innovation; environmental
sustainability; new economy; social and solidarity economy
1. Introduction
Cooperative enterprises play an important role towards a just society, born to tackle the
struggles of governments and markets [1]. Their objective is meant to close the gap on
untackled spaces that derive in society from economic, social, and cultural differences, yet
considered a utopian undertaking or a futile once underappreciated by many [2].
This type of enterprise is inserted within the “Third Sector” or in the “Social and Soli-
darity Economy” that the European Union (EU) identiﬁes as a set of institutions of the eco-
nomic system that act as a third form of production either of goods and/or services between
the State and the private market [3] (For instance, the deﬁnitions associated to these terms
in the “social economy” gateway of the European Commission: https://social-economy-
gateway.ec.europa.eu/about-social-economy/social-economy-deﬁnitions-and-glossary_en
(accessed on 15 October 2023). Similar notions and deﬁnitions are used by the OECD So-
cial Economy programme, see: https://www.oecd.org/cfe/leed/social-economy/social-
economy.htm (accessed on 15 October 2023)). The above is a deﬁnition that was developed
after the crisis of the welfare state of the 1990s [3] and viewed as central to a “...healthy
democratic society” [4]. This same society is now being challenged by resource deple-
tion. The sixth assessment report from the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595. https://doi.org/10.3390/su152115595
https://www.mdpi.com/journal/sustainability
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
2 of 27
(IPCC) [5] has underscored an urgent need for a paradigm shift. Human activities leading
to climate change has in turn affected the availability of our natural resources. This empha-
sizes the growing imperative to adopt methods and approaches focused on sustainability
and resilience [6]. The last decades have demonstrated the need to divide economic growth
from resource exploitation and waste accumulation [7]. Hence, it is supposed that coop-
eratives as business entities have a role, such as any non-cooperative enterprise, to shift
towards environmental sustainability by rethinking how we produce and consume.
The concept of the circular economy (CE) has been signposted as the solution to face
unsustainable economic trends needing to go beyond the linear model where consumption
and disposal are carried out by closing the production loops [8]. The latter is a newer
concept compared to eco-innovation (EI) and they have been viewed as key elements
to support the creation, use, and diffusion of solutions that improve the environmental
performance of products (goods and services), technologies, processes and organizations
compared to existing alternatives [9,10]. To this point, cooperative enterprises, “. . . can play
a very important role in introducing the ideas and practice of resilience to our national and
global communities” [11] (p. 131).
In 2021, the EU established a new action plan for the social economy including collab-
oration and funding opportunities between stakeholders, including cooperatives, where
“...social enterprises [...] which designs a sector different from the traditional public
‘general interest serving’ and the private market [. . . ] can play a unique role in identifying
unmet needs and in developing new types of service” [12]. Without explicitly mentioning
cooperatives, the European Commission (EC)’s CE Action Plan (CEAP) and the upcoming
revision to the Ecodesign Directive and the Sustainable Products Regulation address sev-
eral aspects related to the lively sustainability impacts of enterprises: ensuring less waste,
making sustainable products the norm, empowering consumers to make more sustainable
choices, increasing resource efﬁciency in key economic sectors, improving the durability
and repairability of goods and services, promoting the wide spread of circular business
models (including those in the solidarity and sharing economy) and a just and fair transi-
tion for all economic actors [13] and, years prior, the EU’s EI Action Plan (EcoAP) aiming
to deliver smart, sustainable, inclusive growth via a greener economy [14]. It is a shared
observation with the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD)
about the positive and impactful role played by social economy to promote CES and its
social impacts. The relevance of these European policies derives from an acknowledgement
that public policy can contribute to the transition of society and the economy towards sus-
tainability [15] necessary also for cooperatives to implement, but a deeper understanding
of how this is carried out is needed.
This paper attempts to contribute to the literature of cooperative enterprises by pro-
viding an initial exploratory review of documents focusing on cooperatives, CE and EI. The
results of this study may suggest that while the overall thematic ﬁeld is unexplored, CE
appears to be discussed within the context of cooperatives more strongly comparted to
EI—despite the latter being a scholarly ﬁeld studied for a much longer period. Addition-
ally, the (inter)connection between EI and CE remains also unexplored, when speaking of
cooperatives, and the main cluster themes focus downstream the supply chain (e.g., around
waste management and recycling). Hence, suggests that there is a strong need to tackle CE
and EI in relation to cooperatives, observing in detail their barriers and drivers—how their
management skills and diversiﬁed business structure provide positive outlet—towards
environmental sustainability and what it means for their identity and deﬁnition of their
corporate values and sustainable products and services. The latter can provide an input to
the additional debates on the role of (eco)innovation and CE in the business sphere and
environmental attention.
The remaining of this article is organized as follows: section two offers an introductory
exploration of the literature about cooperative enterprises within the context of environ-
mental and social sustainability. Following on, section three includes the method used
in this study, followed by a fourth section with the results of the thematic analysis of a
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
3 of 27
Scopus data set and the in-depth bibliometric analysis with results from Web of Science
(WoS). Next, section four presents the results of our analysis of the two different datasets.
It unveils topical relationships, scholarly communities, and themes of research about co-
operative enterprises, CE and EI. A concluding section provides a discussion about the
main conclusions, key insights, potential limitations and suggesting avenues for further
scholarly investigation.
2. Cooperative Enterprises and Environmental Sustainability
Cooperatives are integrated into the emerging discourse of the “new economy”, char-
acterized by the integration of ecological and social elements. In contrast to the “traditional”
economy, cooperatives embody a collective and collaborative mindset that should empha-
size the harmonious integration of ecological and social (and solidarity) elements. They
symbolize a new way of thinking where rather than proposing the elimination of the market
as such, its rationale works for a different form of institutionalization of the market where
in cooperative undertakings, “...people (the members) rather than the capital, constitute
the focus on productive activity” [2] (p. 195). The International Cooperative Alliance (ICA)
wants cooperatives to show the world how: “. . . human-centred business models, inspired
by the cooperative values, are building a better world” [16]. It has also been suggested that
cooperatives may represent a contradiction as organizations, “...whose objective was to
counterpose entrepreneurs with the workers’ solidarity and instead cooperatives have set
themselves as new competitors” [17].
The role that business enterprises and single industries play in the much-needed
ecological transition to reduce emissions, reduce pollution, and reduce overall the impact
of human activity is well known and proven. Cooperatives are quite relevant and present
in resource intensive and extractive sectors; for instance, farmers’ cooperatives in the
European Union and in North America account for 30–70% of the market in their respective
world regions [18,19]. One way to the ecological transition is to redeﬁne how we produce
and consume products, making it clear that all stakeholders, including consumers, play a
role in this mission. Some researchers believe this means revisiting economic processes and
business values through innovative measures.
The Web of Science (WoS) repository can be used as a reference to note the growing
interest of the scholarly community to study cooperative enterprises, where it is possible to
identify over 2200 documents published in the period between 1970 and 2023 (A search
in WoS with the keyword “co-operative enterprises” OR “cooperative enterprises” in the
TOPIC ﬁeld resulted in 2209 documents including articles, review articles and editorial
materials only (search conducted on 08.10.23). The results of a similar search increases
to 2600 documents when adding the following additional keywords suggested by WoS:
“cooperative enterprise”, “workers cooperatives”, “cooperative production” and “social
cooperatives”). Recent studies have suggested that cooperative enterprises not only pro-
mote the implementation of Circular Economy Strategies (CES) [10] but also play a role
in fostering the adoption of eco-friendly production technologies [20]. In this context,
the signiﬁcance of EI is emphasized, as it encompasses a range of environmentally ben-
eﬁcial innovations aimed at mitigating our ecological footprint [21]. Consequently, the
exploration of diverse management approaches and business models becomes essential in
understanding the execution of such innovative practices across different types of organiza-
tions, including cooperatives. The latter is alongside the acknowledgement that innovation
application by enterprises is not carried out on its own, rather it enables the progression of
a greener economy, however supported by the application of policies and resulting from
feedback of international “pressures” such as the United Nation’s Sustainable Goals (SDGs)
(Figure 1) that in turn can impact policies. In analyzing where cooperatives stand in the
application of CES and EI, the latter should be kept in mind.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
4 of 27
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
4 of 28 
 
Sustainable Goals (SDGs) (Figure 1) that in turn can impact policies. In analyzing where 
cooperatives stand in the application of CES and EI, the latter should be kept in mind. 
 
Figure 1. Green Innovation and Economic Restructuring to Achieve the SDGs (Based from [15]). 
As a catalyst for CE, EI refers to “...new technologies that improve economic and 
environmental performance but also some deﬁnitions include organizational and social 
changes for improving competitiveness and sustainability and its social, economic and 
environmental pillars” [22]. Within EI studies, it has been observed that the application of 
this form of innovation helps increase a ﬁrm’s economic sustainability and employment 
[23]. From the deﬁnition of EI in the above, it is possible to suggest that EI is a form of 
innovation that takes into consideration other business values. Thus, we wonder if 
cooperatives could be better equipped to facilitate the implementation and uptake of eco-
innovation processes and solutions. While there are some concerns regarding the concept 
of EI related to its eﬀectiveness and overall impact on the environmental and social 
sustainability of enterprises [24], (Some authors such as Kemp (2010) [25] and Ekins (2010) 
[26] have long argued that eco-innovation (EI) is a relative concept; a green or social 
solution is considered an EI when it constitutes a better environmental alternative than 
existing solutions—but without fully quantifying, up-front, those possible rebound or 
future negative eﬀects at the micro (e.g., through LCAs, social-life cycle costing, etc.) or at 
the macro-economic level (e.g., through environmentally-extended input-output 
analyses). An EI can be purposively designed or used to meet environmental targets or to 
achieve green performance gains (e.g., a green technology such as air pollution ﬁlter), but 
it can also be the consequence of unintended actions or regular production-related 
activities of enterprises (e.g., quality or operational eﬃciency gains that lead to 
environmental improvements at the facility level, for instance, from implementing energy 
eﬃciency measures, a total quality management plan, or an integral process automation 
that ultimately minimizes the use of raw materials and waste). This view of EI is yet 
debated by authors, such as Pansera (2011) [24]. It is worth noting that other terms are 
used as synonyms to EI, such as “environmental innovation”, “green innovation”, 
“sustainable innovation”, among others. Nonetheless, in this study we only used the core 
term EI as it is better established in the literature, particularly in the ﬁeld of economics 
and management (for a recent review of terms and ongoing research needs, refer to [27])) 
we acknowledge the scholarly view that social and institutional EI requires educated 
Figure 1. Green Innovation and Economic Restructuring to Achieve the SDGs (Based from [15]).
As a catalyst for CE, EI refers to “...new technologies that improve economic and
environmental performance but also some deﬁnitions include organizational and social
changes for improving competitiveness and sustainability and its social, economic and
environmental pillars” [22]. Within EI studies, it has been observed that the application of
this form of innovation helps increase a ﬁrm’s economic sustainability and employment [23].
From the deﬁnition of EI in the above, it is possible to suggest that EI is a form of innovation
that takes into consideration other business values. Thus, we wonder if cooperatives
could be better equipped to facilitate the implementation and uptake of eco-innovation
processes and solutions. While there are some concerns regarding the concept of EI related
to its effectiveness and overall impact on the environmental and social sustainability of
enterprises [24], (Some authors such as Kemp (2010) [25] and Ekins (2010) [26] have long
argued that eco-innovation (EI) is a relative concept; a green or social solution is considered
an EI when it constitutes a better environmental alternative than existing solutions—but
without fully quantifying, up-front, those possible rebound or future negative effects at
the micro (e.g., through LCAs, social-life cycle costing, etc.) or at the macro-economic level
(e.g., through environmentally-extended input-output analyses). An EI can be purposively
designed or used to meet environmental targets or to achieve green performance gains
(e.g., a green technology such as air pollution ﬁlter), but it can also be the consequence of
unintended actions or regular production-related activities of enterprises (e.g., quality or
operational efﬁciency gains that lead to environmental improvements at the facility level,
for instance, from implementing energy efﬁciency measures, a total quality management
plan, or an integral process automation that ultimately minimizes the use of raw materials
and waste). This view of EI is yet debated by authors, such as Pansera (2011) [24]. It is worth
noting that other terms are used as synonyms to EI, such as “environmental innovation”,
“green innovation”, “sustainable innovation”, among others. Nonetheless, in this study
we only used the core term EI as it is better established in the literature, particularly in the
ﬁeld of economics and management (for a recent review of terms and ongoing research
needs, refer to [27])) we acknowledge the scholarly view that social and institutional EI
requires educated citizens, cultural and institutional diversity, involvement of local actors,
and communication and investment in social capital [24]. Moreover, recent studies go one
step further to suggests the term ‘exnovation’ as a form of phasing out processes, technology
or solutions to truly create, meet or achieve environmental sustainability or policies (e.g.,
phasing out and elimination of coal-based technologies) [28].
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
5 of 27
In recent years, CE has been promoted as an approach to minimize the burden on the
environment, while stimulating the economy [29]. The exact deﬁnition of CE is ambiguous,
and the attempt at a single deﬁnition is merely unachievable [30] leaving out also matters
of justice, gender, or effects on labor [31]. In fact, the deﬁnition of CE remains a subject of
ongoing debate, considered unchallenged [32], with increasing criticism directed at current
proposals, resulting in a longer version as follows:
“[CE] is a multi-level resource use system that stipulates the complete closure of all
resource loops. Recycling and other means that optimize the scale and direction of resource
ﬂows, contribute to the circular economy as supporting practices and activities. In its
conceptual perfect form, all resource loops will be fully closed. In its realistic imperfect
form, some use of virgin resources is inevitable” [33].
While EI can be more efﬁciently implemented through cooperation not only within
companies, but also in strengthening the relationship between different business enterprises,
academia, and governments—who at the same time can implement public policies that
promote the application of the same—limited research has been conducted with a speciﬁc
focus on cooperatives or forms of cooperative governance (as it will be highlighted by the
results of this study presented in Section 4). Furthermore, in view that cooperatives are not
proﬁt-oriented, but as EI is expressed through terms of capitalization, the former authors
expand on where this might position cooperatives not only in competing in the market
but be able to implement EI to achieve environmental sustainability at the speed required
against bigger and alternative ﬁrms [34].
Cooperatives’ business model is also known to increase employment, especially in
more challenged countries. There is research highlighting behavioral aspects of employees
as drivers to EI [35–37] and some recent work is about cooperation and open EI [38], but
until recently the focus has not been on the organizational mode of cooperatives as an
element analyzed for EI generation, adoption, or diffusion. Additionally, there is an overall
absence on identifying how managerial environmental awareness and external resource
acquisition could affect corporate EI activities [34]. Thus, in the case where workers are
potentially also members making managerial decisions, their level of knowledge can impact
potentially the application of EI.
The Rochdale Society of Equitable Pioneers, a cooperative established in 1844 in the
United Kingdom (UK) by twenty-eight impoverished weavers, was successful in deﬁning
the principles for cooperatives of the future [39]. They were suffering from the results of the
Industrial Revolution with low pay, unhealthy cities, and dangerous workplaces resulting
in a cooperative existing through mutual self-help. A sense of mutual help has been
observed also in other countries, such as Italy, where according to the Law 59 (1992) [40] all
cooperatives must transfer to the mutual funds 3% of their proﬁts through an important
ﬁnancing tool that is the solidarity funds (Fondi Mutualistici in Italian). These funds are then
collected to reinvest into the creation of new cooperatives and similar projects, a possibility
absent for other forms of enterprises. Hence, there is a sense of economic (and social)
sustainability required.
It should be noted that while not directly inherent to this paper, the narrative that
cooperatives exist, potentially only, to resolve a social task may be undermining the expecta-
tions (and barriers) to their achievement of environmental sustainability. Cooperatives are
described as a “genuine two-faced Janus [combining] two distinct if not conﬂicting dimen-
sions: the economic dimension of an enterprise that operates within the market and accepts
its logic; and the social dimension of an institution that pursues meta-economics aims and
produces positive externalities for other agenda and for the community. This dual nature is
what makes the cooperative so difﬁcult to explain and so hard to govern” [41] (p. 1).
Economists have criticized cooperatives for their business form, in view of their ability
to thrive in competitive markets regardless of the challenges [42]. Their efﬁciency has been
questioned when compared against investor-owned ﬁrms. According to some theoretical
arguments, it is not uncommon for cooperatives to be considered as being less efﬁcient (but
the contrary is also possible) [43].
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
6 of 27
It becomes essential to incorporate mutualistic principles within democratic business
frameworks to address the gaps in social equity [44]. Cooperatives are described as
acquiring an important role in establishing different forms of organizational network [45]. It
was Charles Fourier in 1808 who initially idealized a world where people could live together
in harmony based on commonly agreed rules and cooperation [46] (p. 14). He was followed
by William Thomson considered the “fathers” not only of cooperativism, but also unions,
as “...instrumental tools against capitalism” [46] where production cooperatives, due to
their capitalist nature, or towards consumerism, could be better managed by cooperatives
enterprises since “workers are their own entrepreneurs” [46] (p. 15). Thus, we observe a
discourse of cooperatives working together for a collective good that should go beyond
personal or industrial greed. A relevant matter in terms of cooperatives when speaking of
EI and CE, as it framed around the role of innovation (technological or other) and nature,
therefore their relationship and implications [24].
Workers in production co-op are viewed as those more likely to make better economic
decisions for everyone’s beneﬁt than single managers [47] (p. 331). Instead, production
co-ops stand out for a speciﬁc reason: they rely on single managers to make rapid and
essential economic decisions. The Mondragon Corporation, the largest global cooperative
complex, exempliﬁes this approach, where workers’ involvement in decision-making is
limited due to the pressures of a globalized market. This evolution has given rise to a
new perspective known as neo-cooperativism, which blends elements of the traditional
cooperative framework with new approaches [48]. Thus, there is an overall understanding
that only cooperatives operate within a speciﬁc, and unique, framework where additional
values are embedded, but also could be providing alternative ways of operating in society
and the business world. How does this affect their ability to remain competitive, innovate,
and implement measures to achieve environmental sustainability?
While not using the term EI, the paper by Osti (2012) [49] remains particularly rel-
evant for our study: it focuses on four distinctive environmental sustainability-oriented
(operational and business) models of (green) social cooperatives (Table 1). The author
identiﬁed key characteristics deﬁning the relationship between social enterprises and the
environment, and further explored if these features could be combined to form a typol-
ogy that assists in guiding empirical research. Osti proposes that relatively simple green
products and highly technical green services can be considered as logical objectives for
green business enterprises. Attention is also paid by this author to the local community,
and production and habitation are pursued as valuable goals. Therefore, activities for the
protection and maintenance of the environment begin as a local matter before becoming of
bigger attention and cooperatives could be more aware of local needs than larger and more
distributed private enterprises.
Table 1. Aim and type of green social enterprises (GSE) in regard to the value set on the environment
[49].
Value Set on the
Environment
Aim of the Social Enterprise
Produce
Produce and Inhabit
Instrumental
A—Simple environmental
services (e.g., urban cleansing)
SIMPLE GSE
B—Territorial promotion services
(e.g., environmental education)
TERRITORIAL GSE
Final
C—Services with high
technical-innovative content
(e.g., solar energy plants)
INNOVATIVE GSE
D—Services incorporating
lifestyles (e.g., residences with
self-contained consumption)
COMMUNITARIAN GSE
Osti also proposes that social cooperatives centered on work and reciprocity are not
sufﬁcient to cope with goods exhaustion that profoundly undermines the possibility of
working and living together. To understand these limits and the impact of environmental
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
7 of 27
problems, knowledge is required about the impacts of man-made (production) activities
and resource use. The latter requires expertise and skills that generally cooperatives may
not have at hand, considering the complexity of the topic and the ﬁeld of work that requires
specialized services, such as waste recycling or clean energy supplies.
It is Manfred Max Neef (2014) [50] who wrote about the crisis caused by the expo-
nential human-induced climate change affecting globally due, among many reasons, to a
disregard of planetary limits and promotion of consumerism (p. 16). He proceeds deﬁning
cooperative alongside solidarity and compassion, as the solutions to the above postulating
a new economy where there the introduction of local co-operation to avoid monopolies
and requires a greater democratic commitment to ensure effectiveness and equity in the
transition to local economies. A new economy that [51] Neva Goodwin (2014, p. 39) dis-
cusses as a way to refocus economic activity, including systems of production, towards an
enhancement of wellbeing. The latter not only when we speak of environmental considera-
tion in our economic equation, rather in our view of employment and work, where in a
decreased market demand it can be supported by job-sharing achieved through growth in
cooperatives. It is debated on our current consumption of resources and how economically
that is impactful with ﬂuctuating prices as the demand increases. Furthermore, they under-
line that a new economy would consider its ecological and social context [51] (p. 45). A
social context that takes into consideration a new form of work vision where it can generate
valuable goods and services, while providing meaning to the worker [51] (p. 50) and where
the way societies organize should include also unpaid work for social causes, frequently
carried by cooperatives.
Cooperatives ﬁnd themselves in an ambiguous position within the economic discourse.
The traditional neoclassical approach tends to overlook their environmental impact, fo-
cusing solely on ﬁnancial gains [42]. When redeﬁning our economy through alternative
management and business structures, we seek to understand if cooperatives can contribute
to positive change and transformation on this issue [42] (p. 10). Thus, this study aims to
explore in the scholarly works the interconnection between cooperatives, regardless of their
type, in the EI and CE context.
In their research on solidarity funds and comparative comparing scenarios from
Italy, United Kingdom, and France, Bernardi et al. (2022) [40] highlighted a crucial policy
implication. They identiﬁed the necessity to establish dedicated institutions in countries
where cooperatives are lagging behind. Traditional institutions may struggle to ﬁnance
cooperatives due to their existing property rights regime. Therefore, research should
investigate those institutions that manage natural resource and supports ﬁnancing CE and
EI actions. Especially considering the difference in business structure, governance, and
ﬁnancial availability that cooperatives are exposed to compared to other forms of legal
business structures.
To this point in relation to the Just Transition, the EU has looked to provide appropriate
labor market and skills policies within the European Social Fund Plus (ESF+) considering
that a rise in fossil fuel will have a signiﬁcant social and disproportional impact to the most
vulnerable. In this scenario, the role of cooperatives is described as “anti-capitalistic” and
the present contradiction of this enterprise’s role within the private economic paradigm [17]
(p. 20). It is debated that either cooperatives are meant to pursue a small space within the
economic framework where those who pursue proﬁt obtain the largest space and—hence
the mutualistic approach has the strongest value—or the cooperatives choose to compete
yet push forward self-interest (towards proﬁt).
In summarizing the discussion offered in the precedent paragraphs, which delve into
the connection between cooperatives and the environment, Figure 2 illustrates key themes
that emerge from our discussion about how sustainable production and consumption
can be conceptualized in cooperative enterprises studies (e.g., by focusing on CE and
EI). Consequently, it becomes clear that these considerations, as well as co-operatives
themselves, could play a pivotal role in shaping economic processes and decisions.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
8 of 27
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
8 of 28 
 
Consequently, it becomes clear that these considerations, as well as co-operatives 
themselves, could play a pivotal role in shaping economic processes and decisions. 
 
Figure 2. Summary diagram on the basic concepts of economy, social, and environment developed 
in the introductory part of this paper (own production). 
3. Methodology 
This paper follows an application of the method developed by van der Have and 
Rubalcaba (2016) in Research Policy [52] conducting a bibliometric analysis of the existing 
body of knowledge on social innovation in the period 1986–2013. These authors curated 
and analyzed a data set of 172 publications using citation data obtained from the WoS and 
Scopus (Speciﬁcally, van den Have and Rubalcaba’s method was as follows: the authors 
ﬁrst retrieved citation data included in the Social Sciences Index of Web of Science. They 
further used Scopus to identify missing and relevant journals in the ﬁeld of social 
innovation, resulting in the manual addition of 14 citation records from three additional 
journals. Following on, they searched both databases for the tern “social innov” in the 
abstract, title or keyword ﬁelds of both knowledge repositories, resulting in an integrated 
data set of 172 unique documents that contained 6500 references and 400 diﬀerent 
keywords. Their results excluded results from publications not written in English, book 
reviews, and editorial articles. For the analysis of the data, they used Sci2 [53] and applied 
techniques based on algorithmic community detection’ and bibliometric coupling’ to 
conduct a scientiﬁc mapping of documents to identify the co-occurrence of keywords and 
citations, the frequency of publications over time, and the burst detection algorithm 
method). van der Have and Rubalcaba used Sci2 to identify four distinctive clusters of the 
literature (based on citation data), and several bibliographic metrics (inter-cluster 
bibliographic coupling and a temporal bar graph with burst analysis). In their study, the 
abovementioned authors [52] acknowledged salient limitations of the selected approach 
that remain valid for our study, most notably: the possible biases and caveats from only 
Figure 2. Summary diagram on the basic concepts of economy, social, and environment developed in
the introductory part of this paper (own production).
3. Methodology
This paper follows an application of the method developed by van der Have and
Rubalcaba (2016) in Research Policy [52] conducting a bibliometric analysis of the existing
body of knowledge on social innovation in the period 1986–2013. These authors curated
and analyzed a data set of 172 publications using citation data obtained from the WoS
and Scopus (Speciﬁcally, van den Have and Rubalcaba’s method was as follows: the
authors ﬁrst retrieved citation data included in the Social Sciences Index of Web of Science.
They further used Scopus to identify missing and relevant journals in the ﬁeld of social
innovation, resulting in the manual addition of 14 citation records from three additional
journals. Following on, they searched both databases for the tern “social innov” in the
abstract, title or keyword ﬁelds of both knowledge repositories, resulting in an integrated
data set of 172 unique documents that contained 6500 references and 400 different keywords.
Their results excluded results from publications not written in English, book reviews, and
editorial articles. For the analysis of the data, they used Sci2 [53] and applied techniques
based on ‘algorithmic community detection’ and ‘bibliometric coupling’ to conduct a
scientiﬁc mapping of documents to identify the co-occurrence of keywords and citations,
the frequency of publications over time, and the burst detection algorithm method). van der
Have and Rubalcaba used Sci2 to identify four distinctive clusters of the literature (based on
citation data), and several bibliographic metrics (inter-cluster bibliographic coupling and a
temporal bar graph with burst analysis). In their study, the abovementioned authors [52]
acknowledged salient limitations of the selected approach that remain valid for our study,
most notably: the possible biases and caveats from only using English speaking documents,
and the use of other similar key words. These are expressed and further detailed in the
limitation’s section of this paper.
As shown in the PRISMA diagram below (Figure 3), in this study we reﬁned van
den Hove and Rubalcaba’s original bibliographic analysis method to follow a two-step
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
9 of 27
review process of the literature. Initially, we conducted a thematic analysis of the literature
focusing on keywords related to cooperatives, CE and/or EI using the Scopus database.
This ﬁrst step had the objective to provide a ‘bird-eye’ view of the connection between CE
and EI within the cooperative’s literature (total number of publications and an overview of
salient topics in a sub-sample of papers). As a second step, and to better understand the
discourse and epistemic communities surrounding these topics in the scholarly literature, a
more robust bibliometric analysis was conducted using a data set of 101 papers obtained
from the WoS. The methodological novelty of our approach may seem minor at ﬁrst
glance [54]. However, a two-step approach adds some foundational elements commonly
used in meta-analyses and systematic literature reviews [55]. Moreover, it was considered a
more adequate approach for the analysis of documents in a rather scattered and emerging
area of knowledge—and where the exclusive use of citation data could have led to misled
interpretations of the results (e.g., by including documents from non-relevant Journals
or by focusing on papers with a superﬁcial focus on the topics of interest (The two-step
method for the bibliographic analysis ultimately used in this paper has some similarities
with the bibliographic review approach employed in [56] and [57], combining thematic
analyses and computer-aided content analysis (using Nvivo [58]) and topic modelling
of documents, respectively). (The data sets with the full list of documents used for the
thematic analysis study (n = 16) and bibliometric analysis (n = 101) have been included as
Supplementary Materials).
 
using English speaking documents, and the use of other similar key words. These are 
expressed and further detailed in the limitation’s section of this paper. 
As shown in the PRISMA diagram below (Figure 3), in this study we reﬁned van den 
Hove and Rubalcaba’s original bibliographic analysis method to follow a two-step review 
process of the literature. Initially, we conducted a thematic analysis of the literature 
focusing on keywords related to cooperatives, CE and/or EI using the Scopus database. 
This ﬁrst step had the objective to provide a bird-eye’ view of the connection between CE 
and EI within the cooperative’s literature (total number of publications and an overview 
of salient topics in a sub-sample of papers). As a second step, and to better understand the 
discourse and epistemic communities surrounding these topics in the scholarly literature, 
a more robust bibliometric analysis was conducted using a data set of 101 papers obtained 
from the WoS. The methodological novelty of our approach may seem minor at ﬁrst 
glance [54]. However, a two-step approach adds some foundational elements commonly 
used in meta-analyses and systematic literature reviews [55]. Moreover, it was considered 
a more adequate approach for the analysis of documents in a rather scattered and 
emerging area of knowledge—and where the exclusive use of citation data could have led 
to misled interpretations of the results (e.g., by including documents from non-relevant 
Journals or by focusing on papers with a superﬁcial focus on the topics of interest (The 
two-step method for the bibliographic analysis ultimately used in this paper has some 
similarities with the bibliographic review approach employed in [56] and [57], combining 
thematic analyses and computer-aided content analysis (using Nvivo [58]) and topic 
modelling of documents, respectively). (The data sets with the full list of documents used 
for the thematic analysis study (n = 16) and bibliometric analysis (n = 101) have been 
included as Supplementary Materials). 
 
Figure 3. PRIMA ﬂow diagram (based on Page et al. (2022) [59]) illustrating the methodology 
employed in this study to integrate the data sets with the relevant articles for analysis (own 
production) (The search for results from Scopus was carried out in October 2022 and the search for 
WoS was carried out in May 2023). 
Figure 3. PRIMA ﬂow diagram (based on Page et al. (2022) [59]) illustrating the methodology em-
ployed in this study to integrate the data sets with the relevant articles for analysis (own production)
(The search for results from Scopus was carried out in October 2022 and the search for WoS was
carried out in May 2023).
3.1. Thematic Analysis Using Scopus and Manual Review
The preliminary thematic review of cooperative studies was conducted in the Scopus
database using the terms ‘co-operativ’ OR ‘co operativ’ in the ﬁelds TITLE, ABSTRACT
and KEYWORDS (also deﬁned as TOPIC by search engines).
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
10 of 27
As a ﬁrst step, a logical approach was employed to exclude articles from non-relevant
Journals, such as those in the medical domain yielding 739 documents (using the excluding
criteria in the automated ﬁlters of Scopus, as shown in Figure 3). This bulk dataset was used
to produce a frequency count of documents published over time (in the period 1988–2023).
Next, the resulting documents were further narrowed by focusing only on documents
containing the authors’ keywords “circular economy” OR “ecoinnovation”. The documents
included in the ﬁnal dataset comprised 16 papers published in the period 2017–2021, which
were manually reviewed to ensure they did indeed pertain to studies about cooperative
enterprises. The data set only included peer-reviewed articles, excluding any other type
of documents.
3.2. Bibliometric Analysis Using WoS and Biblioshiny
This paper also modiﬁed the method of van den Hoven and Rubalcaba (2016) by
employing WoS in conjunction with the Bibliometrix Tool Biblioshiny [60] (implemented
using R Studio [61]). WoS was chosen as the data source, due to its compatibility and
integration with the latter R Studio library tool that was used for the bibliometric analysis.
This methodological expansion enables a more comprehensive and nuanced analysis,
yielding a deeper understanding of the interplay between the examined papers and the
advancement of cooperatives-related themes when discussing EI and CE (The Biblioshiny
software is a tool that has been designed to be used with WoS. This software has the
limitation of being unable to conduct analysis of ‘merged’ datasets that include WoS and
Scopus records. According to the developers, Scopus uses a different method to codify
bibliographic metadata compared to WoS, which prevents Biblioshiny from conducting
citation and co-citation analyses of merged data (See https://www.bibliometrix.org/home/
index.php/faq, accessed on 15 October 2023). This was an important technical limitation
that motivated the authors to test and implement our reﬁned two-step method).
The TOPIC ﬁeld in WoS was used to conduct two searches using different terms of
‘cooperatives’ and ‘circular economy’ or ‘ecoinnovation’ (see the complete list of terms
and criteria in the right-hand side of Figure 3). The research results identiﬁed a total of
142 results; however, after manually removing duplicates from the two separate searches
and excluding non-article publications, a ﬁnal dataset of 101 documents was retained
and used for our analysis (published between the years 2012 and 2023). Biblioshiny
produced results of the inputted data for: citation metrics, three-fold plots, a thematic map,
and cluster metrics (co-occurrence network, clustered thematic map, and factorial map)
(Refer to [60] for a description of the methods used in Biblioshiny with R Studio and their
theoretical/empirical foundations).
4. Results
4.1. Thematic Analysis
This section presents basic citation counts for all documents identiﬁed in Scopus
addressing both cooperatives and the CE or EI. In each sub-section, we present citation
counts for the total number of documents identiﬁed in Scopus for each theme: CE (N = 739)
or EI (N = 67). The number of documents in a sub-sample of the same theme are denoted
with the word ‘n’ (e.g. n = 2).
4.1.1. Cooperatives and CE
In this sub-section, we ﬁrst present the frequency count of the number of articles focus-
ing on CE identiﬁed in Scopus (N = 739). Considering the increased signiﬁcance in the topic
of sustainability, Figure 4 shows the rising number of papers focusing on environmental
sustainability, and related topics conﬁrm the interest of the scholarly community in the
connection between cooperatives and CE.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
11 of 27
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
11 of 28 
 
the topic of sustainability, Figure 4 shows the rising number of papers focusing on 
environmental sustainability, and related topics conﬁrm the interest of the scholarly 
community in the connection between cooperatives and CE. 
 
Figure 4. Final count per year of publications 1988–2022 with speciﬁc separate count for keywords 
“Sustainability”, “Green”, “Environmental”, and “Circular Economy”, N = 739 (own production). 
When looking at the papers ultimately retained for manual analysis in this section 
that focused on CE (n = 14), it was observable that the majority focused on downstream 
processes: CE as tool for emissions reduction [62], and cooperatives as a legal enterprise 
facilitating the application of CES [63] providing further support towards an economy that 
through employment can support reducing inequalities. Values such as co-operation, or 
even solidary-focus economy business models, provide the space to provide and oﬀer 
decent work to eliminate inequalities and poverty [63]. As the objective of CE is to lower 
material input and reduce waste production [64], speciﬁc CES can help preserve products, 
their parts, the used materials [65] promoting ways that can go beyond product 
preservation with direct and indirect impact on the economy [64]. 
A salient message from our review was that eﬃcient CE can be achieved through 
eﬃcient cooperation, which is a key element already embedded in cooperatives. It was 
deemed that it should be, through cooperative eﬀorts, researchers, policymakers, and 
other involved stakeholders’ responsibility to provide the infrastructure to facilitate the 
transition to eﬀective circular business by using realistic CE labelling system, which can 
aﬀect the willingness to pay (WTP) [66]. While labelling products as more circular can 
impact consumer’s WTP, it should not be confused with products that have implemented 
only a partial CE strategy (e.g., using recycled materials without completing the loop 
misleads consumers about CE practices implemented by the company). 
When observing the integration of a speciﬁc type of labor into the market 
contributing to CE, the reviewed literature suggested that cooperatives can act as a bridge 
between the municipality and informal workers, such as waste pickers in developing 
countries. Informal workers who now through a cooperative can also be given the legal 
support needed and social status leading to the creation of a network [67,68]. Thus, as 
cooperatives can support the implementation of CES, the same CE oriented activities can 
push via indirect feedback that a business model should be cooperative in order for CES 
to be more eﬃciently implemented. 
An additional message from the papers in the dataset was related to waste 
management being a crucial aspect when speaking of CES, and that cooperatives are 
successful in providing a market space for selling waste as secondary resource [69] similar 
Figure 4. Final count per year of publications 1988–2022 with speciﬁc separate count for keywords
“Sustainability”, “Green”, “Environmental”, and “Circular Economy”, N = 739 (own production).
When looking at the papers ultimately retained for manual analysis in this section
that focused on CE (n = 14), it was observable that the majority focused on downstream
processes: CE as tool for emissions reduction [62], and cooperatives as a legal enterprise
facilitating the application of CES [63] providing further support towards an economy
that through employment can support reducing inequalities. Values such as co-operation,
or even solidary-focus economy business models, provide the space to provide and offer
decent work to eliminate inequalities and poverty [63]. As the objective of CE is to lower
material input and reduce waste production [64], speciﬁc CES can help preserve products,
their parts, the used materials [65] promoting ways that can go beyond product preservation
with direct and indirect impact on the economy [64].
A salient message from our review was that efﬁcient CE can be achieved through
efﬁcient cooperation, which is a key element already embedded in cooperatives. It was
deemed that it should be, through cooperative efforts, researchers, policymakers, and
other involved stakeholders’ responsibility to provide the infrastructure to facilitate the
transition to effective circular business by using realistic CE labelling system, which can
affect the willingness to pay (WTP) [66]. While labelling products as more circular can
impact consumer’s WTP, it should not be confused with products that have implemented
only a partial CE strategy (e.g., using recycled materials without completing the loop
misleads consumers about CE practices implemented by the company).
When observing the integration of a speciﬁc type of labor into the market contributing
to CE, the reviewed literature suggested that cooperatives can act as a bridge between
the municipality and informal workers, such as waste pickers in developing countries.
Informal workers who now through a cooperative can also be given the legal support
needed and social status leading to the creation of a network [67,68]. Thus, as cooperatives
can support the implementation of CES, the same CE oriented activities can push via
indirect feedback that a business model should be cooperative in order for CES to be more
efﬁciently implemented.
An additional message from the papers in the dataset was related to waste manage-
ment being a crucial aspect when speaking of CES, and that cooperatives are successful
in providing a market space for selling waste as secondary resource [69] similar to the
process of industrial symbiosis as a means to increase environmental, social, and economic
beneﬁts [70] and a mechanism capable of maximizing resource potential [71]. Moreover,
waste management processes require strong, clear, and efﬁcient cooperative models that co-
operatives can provide [72] that can help reduce costs of waste exchange, avoid competition,
leading to a fairer market that is also economically beneﬁcial on the long-term [73–76].
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
12 of 27
A speciﬁc case discussed in a study was the application of CE strategies for a solar
power park for an Olympic village [77]. In order to also achieve some form of decarboniza-
tion, energy cooperatives were identiﬁed as the model that could render successful the
application of these strategies in this context [77].
Barriers when implementing CES for non-cooperative and cooperatives appear to be
similar, such as, lack of information, awareness, and ineffective recycling policies towards
CE [78]. However, in the latter study, there was a clear acknowledgement that cooperative
enterprises could provide additional value to tackle these barriers. In the case of EI, there is
no similar paper to observe whether barriers or drivers remain similar. Additionally, the dis-
course remains downstream the CE chain and focused on cooperativism as the key element
that embedded in cooperatives, however without providing insights to other corporate
elements that potentially make this enterprise-form efﬁcient for CES implementation.
4.1.2. Cooperatives and EI
A similar analysis was undertaken for the documents focusing on EI in cooperatives
in the bulk dataset obtained from Scopus (N = 67). While only one result referred to
cooperative enterprises, an additional EI study was added for stronger analysis that related
to cooperativism in a broader sense but was yet relevant for the research at hand resulting
in two used for this analysis.
Considering the limited number of results, we wondered how innovation in the
traditional and overall sense was studied in cooperative studies to provide an initial
comparison with other forms of innovation (While not necessary for the thematic analysis
nor the bibliometric analysis, to complete Figure 5, a Scopus search for papers focusing
on authors’ keywords (“cooperatives” AND “innovation”) was completed on 23.10.22
(n = 707). Considering it useful only for this ﬁgure and discussion it was excluded from the
PRISMA graph representation).
to the process of industrial symbiosis as a means to increase environmental, social, and 
economic beneﬁts [70] and a mechanism capable of maximizing resource potential [71]. 
Moreover, waste management processes require strong, clear, and eﬃcient cooperative 
models that cooperatives can provide [72] that can help reduce costs of waste exchange, 
avoid competition, leading to a fairer market that is also economically beneﬁcial on the 
long-term [73–76]. 
A speciﬁc case discussed in a study was the application of CE strategies for a solar 
power park for an Olympic village [77]. In order to also achieve some form of 
decarbonization, energy cooperatives were identiﬁed as the model that could render 
successful the application of these strategies in this context [77]. 
Barriers when implementing CES for non-cooperative and cooperatives appear to be 
similar, such as, lack of information, awareness, and ineﬀective recycling policies towards 
CE [78]. However, in the latter study, there was a clear acknowledgement that cooperative 
enterprises could provide additional value to tackle these barriers. In the case of EI, there 
is no similar paper to observe whether barriers or drivers remain similar. Additionally, 
the discourse remains downstream the CE chain and focused on cooperativism as the key 
element that embedded in cooperatives, however without providing insights to other 
corporate elements that potentially make this enterprise-form eﬃcient for CES 
implementation. 
4.1.2. Cooperatives and EI 
A similar analysis was undertaken for the documents focusing on EI in cooperatives 
in the bulk dataset obtained from Scopus (N = 67). While only one result referred to 
cooperative enterprises, an additional EI study was added for stronger analysis that 
related to cooperativism in a broader sense but was yet relevant for the research at hand 
resulting in two used for this analysis. 
Considering the limited number of results, we wondered how innovation in the 
traditional and overall sense was studied in cooperative studies to provide an initial 
comparison with other forms of innovation (While not necessary for the thematic analysis 
nor the bibliometric analysis, to complete Figure 5, a Scopus search for papers focusing on 
authors’ keywords ( “cooperatives” AND “innovation” ) was completed on 23.10.22 (n = 
707). Considering it useful only for this ﬁgure and discussion it was excluded from the 
PRISMA graph representation). 
 
Figure 5. Count papers published with keywords “innovation” and “eco innovation” published 
between 1980 and 2022 focusing those that also include the keyword “cooperative” and those 
without (only) (own production). The right Y axis shows the count only for “innovation (ONLY)”. 
Figure 5. Count papers published with keywords “innovation” and “eco innovation” published
between 1980 and 2022 focusing those that also include the keyword “cooperative” and those without
(only) (own production). The right Y axis shows the count only for “innovation (ONLY)”.
Observing the publication trends over time (Figure 5), by comparing articles con-
taining the keywords “innovation” (intended traditionally), “eco-innovation” only, and
those encompassing the latter and former keywords in conjunction with “cooperatives” it
becomes immediately apparent that the number of publications speciﬁcally exploring the
intersection of EI and cooperatives remains comparatively limited.
When analyzing innovation more traditionally it is shown that cooperatives with
more committed memberships display higher levels of capitalization and that the latter
factor positively relates with innovation levels, also conﬁrmed to enhance cooperatives’
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
13 of 27
performance [79]. Instead, when setting a focus is on EI, it is understood that cooperative
models support the achievement of EI regardless of a ﬁrm business enterprise choice [80,81].
The manual review of documents proved to be challenging due to the reduced number
of papers retained for review (n = 2). The only article that focused on EI in coopera-
tive enterprises, showed no signiﬁcant differences between cooperatives and other ﬁrms
concerning their environmental behavior [13]. Although EI is a ﬁeld with a longer his-
tory than CE (e.g., the ﬁrst EI papers can be tracked to the 1970s and early 2000s (see
e.g., [82,83]), attention to cooperatives related to this form of innovation is near to absent in
the identiﬁed documents.
However, since in the analyzed documents there seems to be an apparent behav-
ioral contrast between differing enterprises, we wondered about how the ﬁrm reasons
and approaches proﬁt could differ and if it instead impacted by management decisions.
Rabadán et al. (2019) [81] examine the capacity of companies to enhance their environ-
mental sustainability as a means to remain competitive in the market. They explore how
increased research and development (R&D) investment, and the advancement of technolog-
ical EI can contribute to this goal. However, since proﬁtability is not the main cooperatives’
goal, how can it compete within the market so that it achieves the ability to have a margin
for R&D spending and technological advancement?
The two papers in our study did not provide speciﬁc evidence to the question above.
Nonetheless, there is attention drawn to SMEs and debate that while innovation provides
the ability to compete, cooperation however could support the creation of an eco-innovative
business model, which does not directly relate to strategies [84]. Especially, with attention
to bringing closer members of the industrial, research, and educational sector [85].
Since cooperatives provide already a business model that takes into account sustain-
ability in other factors, social and economic, they could be more deﬁned to efﬁciently
implement eco-innovative strategies or build EI-oriented business models. Moreover,
an additional concern, and point of study, would be their ability to compete against
bigger companies.
4.2. Bibliometric Analysis (WoS Data Set and Biblioshiny with R Studio; N = 101)
As noted in Section 3.2, citation data from 101 documents obtained from WoS were
used to conduct a bibliographic analysis using the software Biblioshiny with R Studio.
Considering the relatively young age of the topic of sustainable development, and business
sustainability more generally, it is somehow expected that the research and scholarly
attention on cooperatives enterprises would be less developed as observed in the thematic
analysis. In fact, prior to 2012 there appears to be no publication on CE and EI in the
cooperative literature (Figure 6).
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
14 of 28 
 
 
Figure 6. Annual distribution of articles published per all years focusing on cooperatives and CE or 
EI (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
The average citations per year (Figure 7) serves as a vital reference metric for authors 
and journals [60] providing insights into how articles are being cited and shared, reﬂecting 
the topic’s integration into various ﬁelds, fostering interdisciplinary and multi-
methodological approaches. The citations per year have remained stable within the last 
ten years. Thus, while the decrease may be attributed to the possibility that some research 
i
till a
aiti
ubli atio
it ould be i di ati e that the i te e t i
thi ﬁeld i
till lo
Figure 6. Annual distribution of articles published per all years focusing on cooperatives and CE or
EI (created using Biblioshiny; own production).
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
14 of 27
The average citations per year (Figure 7) serves as a vital reference metric for au-
thors and journals [60] providing insights into how articles are being cited and shared,
reﬂecting the topic’s integration into various ﬁelds, fostering interdisciplinary and multi-
methodological approaches. The citations per year have remained stable within the last ten
years. Thus, while the decrease may be attributed to the possibility that some research is
still awaiting publication, it could be indicative that the interest in this ﬁeld is still low.
 
Figure 6. Annual distribution of articles published per all years focusing on cooperatives and CE or 
EI (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
The average citations per year (Figure 7) serves as a vital reference metric for authors 
and journals [60] providing insights into how articles are being cited and shared, reﬂecting 
the topic’s integration into various ﬁelds, fostering interdisciplinary and multi-
methodological approaches. The citations per year have remained stable within the last 
ten years. Thus, while the decrease may be attributed to the possibility that some research 
is still awaiting publication, it could be indicative that the interest in this ﬁeld is still low. 
 
Figure 7. Average Citations per Year for all articles (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
It could be hypothesized that articles authored by a limited number of researchers 
may not receive signiﬁcant citations, which could conﬁne them to their respective ﬁelds, 
excluding interdisciplinary engagement. This underscores the importance of further 
research to prevent the exclusion of cooperatives as a subject in social and economic 
sciences, given their relevance as stakeholders in sustainable development. However, 
integrating cooperatives into interdisciplinary ﬁelds should be carried out cautiously, as 
research suggests they diﬀer from conventional enterprises in their functioning and 
impact. The risk is placing cooperatives as enterprises similar to others or that act just as 
with other types, which as research demonstrates this is not the case. 
The number of publications per year in key Journals (Figure 8) have also remained 
relatively low within the last ten years—being Sustainability and the Journal of Cleaner 
Production the most used outlets for academic publications in the past four years. 
Figure 7. Average Citations per Year for all articles (created using Biblioshiny; own production).
It could be hypothesized that articles authored by a limited number of researchers
may not receive signiﬁcant citations, which could conﬁne them to their respective ﬁelds, ex-
cluding interdisciplinary engagement. This underscores the importance of further research
to prevent the exclusion of cooperatives as a subject in social and economic sciences, given
their relevance as stakeholders in sustainable development. However, integrating coopera-
tives into interdisciplinary ﬁelds should be carried out cautiously, as research suggests they
differ from conventional enterprises in their functioning and impact. The risk is placing
cooperatives as enterprises similar to others or that act just as with other types, which as
research demonstrates this is not the case.
The number of publications per year in key Journals (Figure 8) have also remained
relatively low within the last ten years—being Sustainability and the Journal of Cleaner
Production the most used outlets for academic publications in the past four years. However,
since this study excluded articles in press, it is not possible to know if an upsurge of
publications is coming.
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
15 of 28 
 
However, since this study excluded articles in press, it is not possible to know if an 
upsurge of publications is coming. 
 
Figure 8. Sources’ Production Over Time per Journal (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
The originality of this study is further underscored by the analysis of Figures 9 and 
10. The country that published the most is China (Figure 9), which is also expected 
considering that the concept of CE was ﬁrst introduced in the latter country [86]. The 
presence of Brazil is also not unexpected, since this country’s social context has played a 
signiﬁcant role in fostering the development of cooperatives. Subsequent governmental 
initiatives have further enhanced the understanding and support for cooperatives [87]. 
Figure 8. Sources’ Production Over Time per Journal (created using Biblioshiny; own production).
The originality of this study is further underscored by the analysis of Figures 9 and 10.
The country that published the most is China (Figure 9), which is also expected considering
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
15 of 27
that the concept of CE was ﬁrst introduced in the latter country [86]. The presence of Brazil
is also not unexpected, since this country’s social context has played a signiﬁcant role
in fostering the development of cooperatives. Subsequent governmental initiatives have
further enhanced the understanding and support for cooperatives [87].
 
Figure 8. Sources’ Production Over Time per Journal (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
The originality of this study is further underscored by the analysis of Figures 9 and 
10. The country that published the most is China (Figure 9), which is also expected 
considering that the concept of CE was ﬁrst introduced in the latter country [86]. The 
presence of Brazil is also not unexpected, since this country’s social context has played a 
signiﬁcant role in fostering the development of cooperatives. Subsequent governmental 
initiatives have further enhanced the understanding and support for cooperatives [87]. 
 
Figure 9. Sources’ Production Over Time (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
While these ﬁgures reveal that publications primarily concentrated within the past 
decade, in particular the interest in the subject matter experienced a signiﬁcant surge in 
the most recent four years. This notable upsurge could potentially be attributed to the 
impact of key events such as the Paris Agreement [88] and the ﬁrst European Circular 
Economy Action Plan of 2015 [12] raising awareness and interest in environmental and 
resource eﬃciency issues. Additionally, the declaration by the United Nations designating 
the International Day for cooperatives in 2020 with a specific focus on their contribution to 
combating climate change [89] may have further contributed to the increased attention in 
this area. It should also be understood that while ways to diminish the impact of climate 
Figure 9. Sources’ Production Over Time (created using Biblioshiny; own production).
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
16 of 28 
 
change is through forms of innovation, such as CES and EI, it is crucial to mention that the 
ways are many as the barriers and drivers. Therefore, CE and EI do require specific focus. 
Upon examining the keywords associated with the corresponding authors’ countries 
and those predominantly found within the abstracts, a noteworthy observation emerges. 
While CE emerges as a prominent keyword, the occurrence of “cooperatives” (or similar 
variations) and EI appears to be comparatively lower. This disparity becomes more 
apparent when investigating the prevailing themes within these articles, which are 
currently driving the literature or have done so in the past. The keywords observed also 
in the abstract (Figure 10; left column) appear to be indicating additional similarity to the 
CE thematic analysis where the focus remains downstream (e.g., recycling). 
 
Figure 10. Three-Fold Plot using Abstract Keyterms (AB_TM; Left), Authors’ Countries (AU_CO; 
Middle), and Authors’ Keywords (DE; Right) (created using Biblioshiny; own production). 
It can be inferred that the literature is more focused on the concept of CE, which 
garners greater attention and emphasis, while paradoxically the deﬁnition yet remains to 
be clariﬁed. On the other hand, the presence of cooperatives and EI-related themes may 
be relatively less prominent or inﬂuential in shaping the current discourse. This 
observation highlights the existing trends and priorities within the literature, indicating 
that the CE theme (within the cooperatives arena) (in the 4th ﬁgure in section 4.4) may 
have taken precedence over EI in terms of driving research and scholarly discussions in 
the ﬁeld. 
During the examination of common and emerging themes in the study three motor 
primary themes have been identiﬁed (as depicted in Figure 11; top right). To determine 
the subthemes that drive the exploration of cooperatives within the contexts of EI and CE, 
the analysis focuses on the authors’ keywords by excluding other keywords that could 
inﬂuence the results but are deemed irrelevant (e.g., “results”). This allows for a more 
targeted understanding of the speciﬁc subthemes that propel the direction of research in 
the latter ﬁeld. 
Figure 10. Three-Fold Plot using Abstract Keyterms (AB_TM; Left), Authors’ Countries (AU_CO;
Middle), and Authors’ Keywords (DE; Right) (created using Biblioshiny; own production).
While these ﬁgures reveal that publications primarily concentrated within the past
decade, in particular the interest in the subject matter experienced a signiﬁcant surge in
the most recent four years. This notable upsurge could potentially be attributed to the
impact of key events such as the Paris Agreement [88] and the ﬁrst European Circular
Economy Action Plan of 2015 [12] raising awareness and interest in environmental and
resource efﬁciency issues. Additionally, the declaration by the United Nations designating
the International Day for cooperatives in 2020 with a speciﬁc focus on their contribution to
combating climate change [89] may have further contributed to the increased attention in
this area. It should also be understood that while ways to diminish the impact of climate
change is through forms of innovation, such as CES and EI, it is crucial to mention that the
ways are many as the barriers and drivers. Therefore, CE and EI do require speciﬁc focus.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
16 of 27
Upon examining the keywords associated with the corresponding authors’ countries
and those predominantly found within the abstracts, a noteworthy observation emerges.
While CE emerges as a prominent keyword, the occurrence of “cooperatives” (or similar
variations) and EI appears to be comparatively lower. This disparity becomes more ap-
parent when investigating the prevailing themes within these articles, which are currently
driving the literature or have done so in the past. The keywords observed also in the
abstract (Figure 10; left column) appear to be indicating additional similarity to the CE
thematic analysis where the focus remains downstream (e.g., recycling).
It can be inferred that the literature is more focused on the concept of CE, which
garners greater attention and emphasis, while paradoxically the deﬁnition yet remains to
be clariﬁed. On the other hand, the presence of cooperatives and EI-related themes may be
relatively less prominent or inﬂuential in shaping the current discourse. This observation
highlights the existing trends and priorities within the literature, indicating that the CE
theme (within the cooperatives arena) (in the 4th ﬁgure in Section 4.4) may have taken
precedence over EI in terms of driving research and scholarly discussions in the ﬁeld.
During the examination of common and emerging themes in the study three motor
primary themes have been identiﬁed (as depicted in Figure 11; top right). To determine
the subthemes that drive the exploration of cooperatives within the contexts of EI and CE,
the analysis focuses on the authors’ keywords by excluding other keywords that could
inﬂuence the results but are deemed irrelevant (e.g., “results”). This allows for a more
targeted understanding of the speciﬁc subthemes that propel the direction of research in
the latter ﬁeld.
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
17 of 28 
 
 
Figure 11. Thematic Map with authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own production. The 
following keywords were excluded to provide a deeper understanding of the subtopics: “circular 
economy; cooperative; eco innovation; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual 
analysis; to-”). 
The motor themes in Figure 11, provide insight to those repeated keywords by the 
authors and are meant to give insight to the direction where the research is headed for the 
topics chosen for this paper. The following section presents the main ﬁndings of these 
clusters, also referred below as to motor themes. 
4.3. Motor Themes (Clusters) of Cooperatives Research Focusing on CE and EI 
4.3.1. CE Principles (Brown Cluster): Industrial Ecology & Cradle-to-Cradle 
Industrial ecology, including concepts such as cradle-to-cradle, predates the more 
recent theories of CE and EI. It encompasses approaches aimed at optimizing the entire 
materials cycle, from the use of virgin materials to the production of ﬁnished goods and 
their eventual disposal [90] The theory of industrial ecology was already addressing the
Figure 11. Thematic Map with authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own production. The
following keywords were excluded to provide a deeper understanding of the subtopics: “circular
economy; cooperative; eco innovation; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual
analysis; to-”).
The motor themes in Figure 11, provide insight to those repeated keywords by the
authors and are meant to give insight to the direction where the research is headed for
the topics chosen for this paper. The following section presents the main ﬁndings of these
clusters, also referred below as to ‘motor themes’.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
17 of 27
4.3. Motor Themes (Clusters) of Cooperatives Research Focusing on CE and EI
4.3.1. CE Principles (Brown Cluster): Industrial Ecology & Cradle-to-Cradle
Industrial ecology, including concepts such as cradle-to-cradle, predates the more
recent theories of CE and EI. It encompasses approaches aimed at optimizing the entire
materials cycle, from the use of virgin materials to the production of ﬁnished goods and
their eventual disposal [90]. The theory of industrial ecology was already addressing the
need to revise our production and consumption patterns, even before the 21st century, as a
response to the unsustainable exploitation of the Earth’s natural resources. In both cases,
we can assume that the presence of these subtopics is expected being the foundation of EI
and CE studies.
EI seeks to reduce resource consumption resulting from either environmental issues
or the market’s response to high resource prices, which necessitates new or improved
products and practices that have the desired environmental impact [91]. In this context, it
can be speculated that industrial ecology was originally conceived with similar objectives
in mind.
Overall, industrial ecology and its principles were developed as a means to address
resource overuse and promote more sustainable production and consumption patterns,
aligning with the underlying goals of EI and CE, which are now terms most commonly
used and we would suppose them being intertwined. However, the analysis shows that in
the case cooperative, this may not be the case.
4.3.2. Material Recovery (Pink Cluster): Recycling, Waste Pickers, and by Products
Following the ﬁrst cluster, the pink one focuses on the end of the supply chain and what
can be done with products once it reaches the End-Of-Life and/or End-Of-Use. Two sub-
concepts are also commonly observed and described in CE and EI. As an example of EI, the
former are relevant since not only do they tackle a branch of research material opportunities
from waste (e.g., material science), but the behavior behind product consumption, such as
product-as-a-service where a product is rather rented and returned, rather than disposed of.
In the particular case of waste pickers, as previously underlined in the thematic analysis,
they are mostly discussed as a form of employment in developing countries. In this case,
cooperative enterprises are described as those who can efﬁciently manage and act as
connectors between the government (or other private enterprises) and local people who
are hired as pickers.
4.3.3. Material Management (Green Cluster): Waste Management, Governance, and
Municipal Solid Waste
The last cluster regards how governance and management can matter in terms of waste
management. Discard studies [92] have shed light on the multifaceted nature of waste,
transcending its perception as a mere by-product of human desires or a technical challenge
within the domain of sanitation experts. Regarding the intricacies of waste management
processes, scholars have illuminated its central role in discussions concerning materiality,
ontology, labor dynamics, environmental justice movements, and critical examinations
of modernity and imperial constructs [93]. Especially if investigating the relationship
between waste and non-human entities, due to its profound implications for the future of
the planetary ecosystem.
4.4. Relationship between Clusters
Although it appears that the three clusters are naturally interconnected, this is not
visible in the analysis (Figure 11). The three thematic clusters remain connected mostly
more to the theme of CE, rather than EI, which instead remains also isolated and yet to be
discussed in regard to cooperative enterprises. An assumption potentially observed from
the thematic analysis, is that the role of the cooperative requires further exploration and
consideration without it being limited and framed either in the waste management arena
potentially making a distinction between EI and CE or better clarifying its interconnected-
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
18 of 27
ness. However, since CE appears to a ﬁeld that yet requires more detailed deﬁnition, the
focus applied to co-operatives could begin from EI studies where impacting factors and
elements—as barriers and drivers—are more deﬁned.
Figure 12 shows the co-occurrence network (A keyword co-occurrence network (KCN)
is centered on comprehending the elements and organization of knowledge within a
scientiﬁc or technical domain, achieved by studying the connections between keywords
in the body of literature [94]) analysis suggesting the presence of four distinct clusters,
comprising a total of 34 keywords. These clusters are visualized through graphs, where
keyword connections are represented by nodes and links.
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
19 of 28 
 
 
Figure 12. Co-occurence network with authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own 
production. The following keywords were excluded for deeper understanding of the subtopics: 
“circular economy; cooperative; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual analysis; 
to-; eco innovation”). 
In Figure 12, each node represents a speciﬁc keyword, and its size corresponds to the 
frequency of appearance within the analyzed documents. Consequently, a larger node 
size indicates a higher frequency of occurrence, while a smaller node size indicates a lower 
frequency. By examining the network and its clusters, it becomes possible to discern the 
relationships and patterns among the keywords. Thus, this analysis oﬀers insights into 
the interconnectedness and thematic associations within the literature, aiding in 
identifying the central themes and their respective prominence based on the frequency of 
appearance. 
As shown in Figure 12, there is no clear node connection between keywords related 
to EI and those for CE. As expected the larger node remains CE (Figure 13) with greater 
connections. This may indicate not only an absence of deeper research on the deﬁned 
relationship between EI and CE, but also a larger interest in CES rather than EI. 
 
Figure 12. Co-occurence network with authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own production.
The following keywords were excluded for deeper understanding of the subtopics: “circular economy;
cooperative; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual analysis; to-; eco innovation”).
In Figure 12, each node represents a speciﬁc keyword, and its size corresponds to the
frequency of appearance within the analyzed documents. Consequently, a larger node size
indicates a higher frequency of occurrence, while a smaller node size indicates a lower
frequency. By examining the network and its clusters, it becomes possible to discern the
relationships and patterns among the keywords. Thus, this analysis offers insights into the
interconnectedness and thematic associations within the literature, aiding in identifying
the central themes and their respective prominence based on the frequency of appearance.
As shown in Figure 12, there is no clear node connection between keywords related
to EI and those for CE. As expected the larger node remains CE (Figure 13) with greater
connections. This may indicate not only an absence of deeper research on the deﬁned
relationship between EI and CE, but also a larger interest in CES rather than EI.
The use of clustered thematic maps is to highlight the way the subtopics of this
scholarly literature analysis are interconnected. Figure 14 provides an in-depth view
by looking at subtopics when the main keywords, used in the ﬁrst keyword search, are
excluded in order to observe how keywords are subsequently interacting. Figure 14
shows the results of four main groups: industrial symbiosis/industrial ecology, waste
management, recycling, and sustainable development. Other themes such as innovation
or cooperation are less discovered and interconnected. As shown in Figure 15, even when
all keywords are included, the latter still appears to be valid. Thus, while these two latter
ﬁgures may not provide further information, they do provide further conﬁrmation of what
has been already identiﬁed.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
19 of 27
the interconnectedness and thematic associations within the literature, aiding in 
identifying the central themes and their respective prominence based on the frequency of 
appearance. 
As shown in Figure 12, there is no clear node connection between keywords related 
to EI and those for CE. As expected the larger node remains CE (Figure 13) with greater 
connections. This may indicate not only an absence of deeper research on the deﬁned 
relationship between EI and CE, but also a larger interest in CES rather than EI. 
 
Figure 13. Co-occurrence network with authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own 
production. All keywords were included.). 
The use of clustered thematic maps is to highlight the way the subtopics of this 
scholarly literature analysis are interconnected. Figure 14 provides an in-depth view by 
looking at subtopics when the main keywords, used in the ﬁrst keyword search, are 
Figure 13. Co-occurrence network with authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own produc-
tion. All keywords were included).
Sustainability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
20 of 28 
 
excluded in order to observe how keywords are subsequently interacting. Figure 14 shows 
the results of four main groups: industrial symbiosis/industrial ecology, waste 
management, recycling, and sustainable development. Other themes such as innovation 
or cooperation are less discovered and interconnected. As shown in Figure 15, even when 
all keywords are included, the latter still appears to be valid. Thus, while these two latter 
ﬁgures may not provide further information, they do provide further conﬁrmation of 
what has been already identiﬁed. 
 
Figure 14. Clustered Thematic Map using authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own 
production. The following keywords were excluded for deeper understanding: “circular economy; 
cooperative; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual analysis; to-; eco 
innovation”). 
Figure 14. Clustered Thematic Map using authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own
production. The following keywords were excluded for deeper understanding: “circular economy;
cooperative; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual analysis; to-; eco innovation”).
To ﬁnally investigate if the references ideally are treated and chosen similarly among
the papers selected for analysis, a conceptual structure map using the Multiple Correspond-
ing Analysis (MCA) (Figure 16) and Keywords Plus was carried out. Keywords Plus is
used in WoS to identify words or phrases that frequently appear in the titles of an article’s
references, but do not appear in the title of the article itself [95].
In the MCA conceptual structure map (Figure 16), concepts are visually represented
based on their relationships and importance. The x-axis shows similarity or thematic
connections, while the y-axis represents signiﬁcance or weight. Consequently, the analysis
reveals that the references cited in the analyzed articles exhibit similar keywords grouped
into two main clusters. Among these clusters, EI emerges as a prominent theme, although
it is less connected to other concepts or investigated compared to CE when discussing
cooperatives. Additionally, the secondary cluster is more inclusive, and tackles more
secondary themes altogether. Hence, the references utilized by the same articles used for
this paper’s research demonstrated a similar clustering pattern.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
20 of 27
 
Figure 14. Clustered Thematic Map using authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own 
production. The following keywords were excluded for deeper understanding: “circular economy; 
cooperative; eco-innovation; cooperatives; paper; results; data; textual analysis; to-; eco 
innovation”). 
 
Figure 15. Clustered Thematic Map using authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own
production. All keywords were included).
nability 2023, 15, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
21 of 28 
Figure 15. Clustered Thematic Map using authors’ keywords (created using Biblioshiny; own 
production. All keywords were included.). 
To ﬁnally investigate if the references ideally are treated and chosen similarly among 
the papers selected for analysis, a conceptual structure map using the Multiple 
Corresponding Analysis (MCA) (Figure 16) and Keywords Plus was carried out. Keywords 
Plus is used in WoS to identify words or phrases that frequently appear in the titles of an 
article’s references, but do not appear in the title of the article itself [95]. 
 
Figure 16. Factorial Map of Keywords’ Plus (Two Clusters) (created using Biblioshiny; own 
production. All keywords were included) The authors’ keywords were not used in this analysis 
since they did not provide enough indicative information. 
In the MCA conceptual structure map (Figure 16), concepts are visually represented 
based on their relationships and importance. The x-axis shows similarity or thematic 
connections, while the y-axis represents signiﬁcance or weight. Consequently, the analysis 
reveals that the references cited in the analyzed articles exhibit similar keywords grouped 
into two main clusters. Among these clusters, EI emerges as a prominent theme, although 
it is less connected to other concepts or investigated compared to CE when discussing 
cooperatives. Additionally, the secondary cluster is more inclusive, and tackles more 
secondary themes altogether. Hence, the references utilized by the same articles used for 
this paper’s research demonstrated a similar clustering pattern. 
This outcome may not appear surprising, but the additional information that it 
provides is that not only do CE and EI not interconnect, but the references used by 
Figure 16. Factorial Map of Keywords’ Plus (Two Clusters) (created using Biblioshiny; own produc-
tion. All keywords were included). The authors’ keywords were not used in this analysis since they
did not provide enough indicative information.
This outcome may not appear surprising, but the additional information that it pro-
vides is that not only do CE and EI not interconnect, but the references used by academic in
each relative ﬁeld is also similar without providing stronger interdisciplinarity. The latter
remains a large limitation, since as scholars acknowledge a ﬁeld and establish it within
academic authority structures, it paves the way for enhanced knowledge development [96].
Thus, in the case of cooperative studies, the abilities, drivers, and barriers of cooperatives
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
21 of 27
to achieve environmental sustainability and innovation need to be researched to acquire a
stronger knowledge foundation.
5. Conclusions
Discussion and Value Creation
This document addressed the question of better understanding the existing connection
between the topics of CE and EI and cooperative enterprises in scholarly literature. As the
urgency for environmental sustainability increases, it is necessary to include all stakeholders
into the scholarly research. For this reason, this paper aimed at understanding how CE and
EI as thematic ﬁelds were integrated within the cooperative studies. To achieve this aim,
we looked to carry out a preliminary thematic analysis using citation data and a manual
review of a sample of documents from Scopus, followed by a robust bibliometric analysis
from WoS citation data using R Studio’s Bibliometrix (Biblioshiny) package.
The outcomes of this paper reveal the presence of distinct research clusters centered
around three overarching themes. However, these thematic domains exhibit insufﬁcient
interconnection, as indicated by the thematic maps, revealing certain critical associations
are overlooked considering the critiqued deﬁnitions of EI and CE and how those are then
implemented within the cooperative enterprise. Speciﬁcally, while the exploration of co-
operatives’ adoption of CE strategies has gained reasonable attention, the same level of
scrutiny is not extended to the study of EI in the context of cooperative studies. Con-
sequently, the scholarly discourse not only lacks a robust linkage between CE and EI in
academic literature but also this connection is further attenuated by the inadequate fo-
cus on the upstream dimensions (e.g., resource management versus waste handling) and
(democratic or other) governance that inﬂuence the implementation of eco-conscious forms
of innovation like EI.
This disjointed knowledge representation might foster assumptions about coopera-
tives that do not furnish a holistic grasp of their speciﬁc attributes. For instance, without
delving into diverse managerial approaches, such as more participatory and inclusive
methods, cooperatives often become subjects of analysis within the same conceptual frame-
work as other enterprise types. This, however, falls short of capturing the distinctive
potential of cooperatives as efﬁcacious models for attaining sustainable development or
fully uncovering the reasons behind their potential success (or even failure). These gaps
in the literature obstruct the exploration of how distinct enterprise forms, cooperatives
included, can contribute to sustainable business practices and streamlined operational
modes. Therefore, this analysis puts forth three pivotal ﬁndings.
Firstly, a more comprehensive and interconnected investigation is required when
examining cooperatives, particularly to comprehend the intricate interplay between EI and
CE (and the industrial sector and elements). The precise nature of this interrelation and its
consequential implications remain ambiguous. Secondly, the predominant focus of inquiry
predominantly centers on downstream facets of cooperative activities (e.g., waste man-
agement), relegating other pertinent dimensions that warrant comprehensive exploration.
Lastly, both the realms of CE and EI lack exhaustive insights into the hurdles, incentives,
and the strategic role that cooperation might assume in their adoption. Given the limited
corpus of available literature for scrutiny, further research is imperative. Neglecting to
address these facets poses the risk of weakening direct reinforcement or lucid associa-
tions, not solely between CE and EI, but also concerning cooperative enterprises and their
implications within this speciﬁc business framework.
The observed uncertainty hinders our understanding of how cooperatives can con-
tribute to sustainable development from the upstream of the supply chain. The latter
is relevant since a further detailed understanding of cooperatives enterprises, for these
ﬁelds, can help distinguish the barriers and drivers in different sectors and cooperatives
types going beyond an economic discourse framed in a neoclassical versus new economy
narrative, and rather focusing on democratic stakeholding that provide space to what is in
its entirety a business form that appears excluded from market-considerations but has to
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
22 of 27
comply to the environmental-needs nonetheless (and is yet expected to compete with other
enterprise forms). There appears to be an absence to the role that cooperatives would place
within the market when implementing EI pressures for sustainable CE practices against
larger industries. Furthermore, there is an additional absence to how local and regional
factors play a role as observed instead when studying singularly EI or CE.
Since cooperatives exist on values that go beyond proﬁt, the pressure to innovate
towards efﬁcient CE strategies, it is necessary to revisit our paradigm in a market and
economic system that does not beneﬁt cooperatives revisiting our vision of production
and consumption. Furthermore, if we consider EI as the means of harmonizing economic
activities with environmental resilience [97] it is proven that regulations and government
involvement in the promotion of EIs come out from a cooperative approach that can help
business approach clear technologies and products.
It is already evident that CE can serve as a valuable tool for cooperatives to attain the
fundamental pillars of sustainability. By considering CE as a catalyst for sustainable devel-
opment, cooperatives emerge as instrumental in implementing CE, particularly in economi-
cally disadvantaged regions. While some solutions for decarbonization and environmental
sustainability already exist, they often face limitations and high costs. However, the cooper-
ative model can help mitigate these challenges, potentially reducing expenses. It is therefore
apparent that CE represents a strategic choice for cooperatives to enhance their environ-
mental sustainability efforts, while cooperatives themselves provide an optimal framework
to efﬁciently implement these strategies, ultimately leading to reduced inequalities.
Cooperatives serve as a promising model for integrating sustainable EI and CE strate-
gies, contributing to environmental sustainability, and reducing inequalities. Further
research and analysis are warranted to delve deeper into the role of cooperatives in driv-
ing sustainable practices and their impact on various sectors and regions, especially in
the context of market-positioning, economic competition (and reciprocity), effective man-
agement styles, and cooperative-speciﬁc barriers. Hence, as we rethink production and
consumption a stronger understanding of cooperative and sustainable EI and CE within
a unique enterprise as the cooperative could lead to a more effective strategy implemen-
tation toward environmental sustainability that takes into consideration values, such as
democratic governance, social justice, and stakeholder inclusion for an ideal socially and
environmentally sustainable circular cooperative (SECC).
6. Limitations and Further Research
The main limitation is the need to provide a deeper study based on speciﬁc sub
keywords in the title and abstract (e.g., on a speciﬁc circular step or cooperative type),
which was not carried out considering the overall aim of this paper which was meant to
keep the analysis at the general level and to observe existing relationships and themes.
It is relevant to note that while there were not many papers resulting from our research
for the analysis, the problem here is too large for manual analysis. The latter is the reason
why we deemed a bibliometric analysis is more adapt form of analysis for this paper.
We acknowledge that further graphical representations within the dataset did not exhibit
substantial variability or informative patterns, thereby hindering our capacity for in-depth
analysis. This is indicative of a limitation of scholarly attention to this topic, rather than an
analysis error.
According to the initial results from the thematic analysis and those highlighted gaps,
between the role of production cooperatives and application of CE and EI, shows that while
there is potential for cooperatives to make a difference due to their social attention and
ability to include multiple stakeholders, there is little clarity on how this can be carried out.
Furthermore, it demonstrates the complexity of the application and transition to such CE
and EI models.
There is difﬁculty in recognizing the conceptual boundaries among EI, business mod-
els, and CE with challenges to measure a company’s performance in CE and EI [5]. Addi-
tional analysis would require expanding within the production chain since results demon-
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
23 of 27
strate that they were quite limited when focusing on speciﬁc CE strategy applications, such
as upstream of the supply chain, such as for decisions prior to production and distribution,
rather than purchasing and product design. Thus, the approach for cooperatives should
be investigated alongside, considering the different models possibly suggesting that the
private companies and cooperatives may not necessarily apply CE and EI in similar ways
and/or with the same perception. Hence, this would also require expansion based on
geographical location, sector, and industrial speciﬁcities.
Further research should identify the barriers and drivers toward EI and CE that coop-
eratives incur against other forms of enterprise. Although cooperatives already proceed
in a collaborating manner just simply due to its governance it should be useful to see
which economic and social elements support cooperatives’ successful transition to CE and
EI measures.
A deeper understanding of the policy implications or externalities should be required,
since considering the studies identiﬁed for CE, barriers may be found not only internally.
However, regarding internal management, since identity is an extremely important factor
in the cooperative movement deﬁning the spirit and model on which a cooperatives
operate, there should be analysis on the insertion of environmental identity. Considering
the aforementioned scholarly sides to EI and CE studies, as well within the cooperative
movement, deﬁning a potential environmentally-focused values would be useful to those
cooperatives within to provide forms of innovation or CES that are land on stronger
environmental values.
Given the increasing signiﬁcance of environmental sustainability as a needed strat-
egy, there arises a proposition to incorporate CE and environmentally-focused values into
the principles of the International Cooperative Alliance [98]. This suggestion stems from
the current juncture where cooperatives ﬁnd themselves, necessitating heightened public
awareness to accomplish their sustainability objectives [99]. Consequently, a more pro-
nounced emphasis on cooperative enterprises’ narrative, recognition, and concerted efforts
will become imperative also when tackling environmental sustainability and (concepts
of responsible) innovation that is now currently unexplored as identiﬁed by this paper.
Potentially expanding on the questions of a form of democratic governance, such as those
ideally embedded by cooperatives, which already expand on the concepts of stakeholder
inclusion (or avoidance of exclusion) and heightened participatory elements would either
apply EI and CE efﬁciently. Additionally, there is the question at which level would EI
and/or CES be implemented and how they are induced internally or considering their
level of levels engagement and dynamics [100]. Furthermore, a stronger understanding
of the connection between EI and CE can provide support to how forms of innovation
are incorporated by a model such as the cooperative one. Thus, it is expected that further
analysis and scrutiny of this research will be crucial to the efﬁcient application of EI and
CES by cooperatives and identity reinforcement can structure these challenges.
Supplementary Materials:
The following supporting information can be downloaded at:
https://www.mdpi.com/article/10.3390/su152115595/s1, Table S1: Excel list of papers used in
the Thematic Analysis; Table S2: Excel list of papers used in the Bibliometric Analysis.
Author Contributions: A.G. conceived the presented idea and topic. A.G. developed the theoretical
and analytical framework, performed the methodology and analysis, and wrote different drafts of the
paper. F.J.D.L. guided the conceptual process, revised the draft versions of the manuscript, reviewed
the methodological approach, and provided comments and contributions. All authors discussed the
results and contributed to the ﬁnal manuscript. All authors have read and agreed to the published
version of the manuscript.
Funding: This research received no external funding.
Institutional Review Board Statement: Not applicable.
Informed Consent Statement: Not applicable.
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
24 of 27
Data Availability Statement: The full dataset of the used papers for this research are provided in as
Supplementary Materials.
Acknowledgments: The research underpinning this article is inserted into the research initiative
called Climate Circular Coop (www.climatecircularcoop.it) led by the University of Ferrara and con-
nected to the University’s PhD programme on Sustainability and Well-being. The initiative is funded
by the PON (Programma Operativo Nazionale (PON) del Ministero dell’Istruzione, dell’Università
e della Ricerca) by the Italian Ministry of Education, Universities and Research. EIT Climate KIC’s
Transitions Hub provides in-kind supervision to this PhD research.
Conﬂicts of Interest: The authors declare no conﬂict of interest.
References
1.
Codini, A. Le Cooperative Sociali; FrancoAngeli: Milan, Italy, 2007.
2.
Zamagni, V.N. The Cooperative Enterprise: A Valid Alternative for a More Balanced Society. In Cooperatives in a Post-Growth Era
Creating Cooperative Economics; Novkovic, S.S., Webb, T., Eds.; Zed Books: London, UK, 2014; pp. 194–210.
3.
Castellini, M.; Maran, L. An Overview of Management Systems in the Cooperative Sector. An Analysis of the Italian Leghe. J. Coop.
Account. Report. 2012, 1, 5. Available online: https://saturn.smu.ca/webﬁles/2012-1-2-p1.pdf (accessed on 11 October 2022).
4.
Smith, M. Diversity and Identity in the Non-proﬁt Sector: Lessons from LGBT Organizing in Toronto. Soc. Policy Adm. 2005, 39,
463–480. [CrossRef]
5.
Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change. Summary for Policymakers: Climate Change 2021. The Physical Science Basis.
2021. Available online: https://www.ipcc.ch/report/ar6/wg1/downloads/report/IPCC_AR6_WGI_SPM_ﬁnal.pdf (accessed on
10 September 2022).
6.
Giannetti, B.F.; Diaz Lopez, F.J.; Liu, G.; Agostinho, F.; Sevegnani, F.; Almeida, C.M. A Resilient and Sustainable World:
Contributions from Cleaner Production, Circular Economy, Eco-innovation, Responsible Consumption, and Cleaner Waste
Systems. J. Clean. Prod. 2022, 384, 135465. [CrossRef]
7.
Chioatto, E.; Zecca, E.; D’Amato, A. Which Innovations for a Circular Business Model? A Product Life-Cycle Approach. FEEM
Working Paper 2020. [CrossRef]
8.
Ghisellini, P.; Cialani, C.; Ulgiati, S. A review on circular economy: The expected transition to a balanced interplay of environmen-
tal and economic systems. J. Clean. Prod. 2016, 114, 11–32. [CrossRef]
9.
de Jesus, A.; Antunes, P.; Santos, R.; Mendonça, S. Eco-innovation in the transition to a circular economy: An analytical literature
review. J. Clean. Prod. 2018, 172, 2999–3018. [CrossRef]
10.
Ziegler, R.; Poirier, C.; Lacasse, M.; Murray, E. Circular Economy and Cooperatives—An Exploratory Survey. Sustainability 2023,
15, 2530. [CrossRef]
11.
Homer-Dixon, T. The Cooperative Enterprise: A Valid Alternative for a More Balanced Society. In Cooperatives in a Post-Growth
Era Creating Cooperative Economics; Novkovic, S., Webb, T., Eds.; Zed Books: London, UK, 2014; pp. 115–134.
12.
European Commission. Circular Economy Action Plan. 2020. Available online: https://ec.europa.eu/environment/strategy/
circular-economy-action-plan_en (accessed on 30 August 2022).
13.
Calle, F.; González-Moreno, N.; Carrasco, I.; Vargas-Vargas, M. Social Economy, Environmental Proactivity, Eco-Innovation and
Performance in the Spanish Wine Sector. Sustainability 2020, 12, 5908. [CrossRef]
14.
EUR-LEX—52011DC0899—EN—EUR-LEX. (n.d.). Available online: https://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/EN/ALL/?uri=
celex%3A52011DC0899 (accessed on 30 August 2022).
15.
Könnölä, T.; Del Río González, P.; Carrillo-Hermosilla, J.; López, F.J.D. Innovación verde en América Latina y el Caribe: Marco
conceptual|Publications. In Banco Interamericano De Desarrollo (IDB-TN-2 704); Banco Interamericano de Desarrollo: Washington,
DC, USA, 2023; Available online: https://publications.iadb.org/publications/spanish/viewer/Innovacion-verde-en-America-
Latina-y-el-Caribe-marco-conceptual.pdf (accessed on 2 October 2023).
16.
Voinea, A. International Day of Cooperatives Theme Announced. Cooperative News, 3 May 2022. Available online: https://
www.thenews.coop/162106/sector/regional-organisations/international-day-of-cooperatives-theme-announced/(accessed on
11 May 2022).
17.
Jossa, B. Cooperativismo, Capitalismo e Socialismo. Una Nuova Stella Polare per la Sinistra; Novalogos: Hague, The Netherlands, 2012.
18.
Cropp, R.; Ingalsbe, G. Structure and scope of agricultural cooperatives. In Cooperatives in Agriculture; Cobia, D., Ed.; Prentice-Hall:
Englewood Cliffs, NJ, USA, 1989; pp. 35–67.
19.
van Bekkum, O.-F.; van Dijk, G. (Eds.) Agricultural Cooperatives in the European Union. Trends and Issues on the Eve of the 21st
Century; Van Gorcum: Assen, The Netherlands, 1997.
20.
Sarkar, A.; Wang, H.; Rahman, A.; Qian, L.; Memon, W.H. Evaluating the roles of the farmer’s cooperative for fostering
environmentally friendly production technologies-a case of kiwi-fruit farmers in Meixian, China. J. Environ. Manag. 2022,
301, 113858. [CrossRef]
21.
Arundel, A.; Kemp, R. Measuring eco-innovation. Res. Pap. Econ. 2009, 17, 1–40. Available online: http://collections.unu.edu/
eserv/UNU:324/wp2009-017.pdf (accessed on 2 October 2023).
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
25 of 27
22.
Carrillo-Hermosilla, J.; del González, P.R.; Könnölä, T. What is eco-innovation? In Eco-Innovation; Palgrave Macmillan: London,
UK, 2009. [CrossRef]
23.
Harabi, N. Employment Effects of Ecological Innovations: An Empirical Analysis. Munich Personal RePEc Archive. 2000.
Available online: https://mpra.ub.uni-muenchen.de/4395/ (accessed on 2 October 2023).
24.
Pansera, M. The Origins and Purpose of Eco-Innovation. Glob. Environ. 2011, 4, 128–155. [CrossRef]
25.
Kemp, R. Eco-innovation: Deﬁnition, measurement and open research issues. Econ. Politica 2010, 3, 397–420. [CrossRef]
26.
Ekins, P. Eco-innovation for environmental sustainability: Concepts, progress and policies. Int. Econ. Econ. Policy 2010, 7, 267–290.
[CrossRef]
27.
Reno, J. Waste and Waste Management. Annu. Rev. Anthropol. 2015, 44, 557–572. [CrossRef]
28.
Jacob, K. Shaping System Innovation: Transformative environmental policies.
In Sustainability and Innovation; Springer:
Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2018. [CrossRef]
29.
Moraga, G.; Huysveld, S.; Mathieux, F.; Blengini, G.A.; Alaerts, L.; van Acker, K.; de Meester, S.; Dewulf, J. Circular economy
indicators: What do they measure? Resour. Conserv. Recycl. 2019, 146, 452–461. [CrossRef]
30.
Korhonen, J.; Honkasalo, A.; Seppälä, J. Circular Economy: The Concept and its Limitations. Ecol. Econ. 2018, 143, 37–46.
[CrossRef]
31.
MahmoumGonbadi, A.; Genovese, A.; Sgalambro, A. Closed-loop supply chain design for the transition towards a circular
economy: A systematic literature review of methods, applications and current gaps. J. Clean. Prod. 2021, 323, 129101. [CrossRef]
32.
Betancourt Morales, C.M.; Zartha Sossa, J.W. Circular economy in Latin America: A systematic literature review. Bus. Strategy
Environ. 2020, 29, 2479–2497. [CrossRef]
33.
Figge, F.; Thorpe, A.S.; Gutberlet, M. Deﬁnitions of the circular economy: Circularity matters. Ecol. Econ. 2023, 208, 107823.
[CrossRef]
34.
Peng, X.; Liu, Y. Behind eco-innovation: Managerial environmental awareness and external resource acquisition. J. Clean. Prod.
2016, 139, 347–360. [CrossRef]
35.
Ramus, C.A. Encouraging innovative environmental actions: What companies and managers must do. J. World Bus. 2002, 37,
151–164. [CrossRef]
36.
Ramus, C.A. Employee Environmental Innovation in Firms: Organizational and Managerial Factors; Routledge: London, UK, 2003.
37.
Ramus, C.A.; Steger, U. The roles of supervisory support behaviors and environmental policy in employee “Ecoinitiatives” at
leading-edge European companies. Acad. Manag. J. 2000, 43, 605–626. [CrossRef]
38.
Chistov, V.; Carrillo-Hermosilla, J.; Aramburu, N. Open eco-innovation. Aligning cooperation and external knowledge with the
levels of eco-innovation radicalness. J. Open Innov. Technol. Mark. Complex. 2023, 9, 100049. [CrossRef]
39.
Fairbairn, B. The Meaning of Rochdale: The Rochdale Pioneers and the Cooperative Principles. Research in Agricultural &
Applied Economics. 1994. Available online: https://ageconsearch.umn.edu/record/31778/ (accessed on 5 September 2022).
40.
Bernardi, A.; Berranger, C.; Mannella, A.; Monni, S.; Realini, A. Sustainable but Not Spontaneous: Cooperatives and the Solidarity
Funds in Italy. Sustainability 2022, 14, 4516. [CrossRef]
41.
Zamagni, S.; Zamagni, V. Cooperative Enterprise: Facing the Challenge of Globalization; Edward Elgar Publishing: Cheltenham,
UK, 2011.
42.
Cook, M.L. The Future of U.S. Agricultural Cooperatives: A Neo-Institutional Approach. Am. J. Agric. Econ. 1995, 77, 1153–1159.
[CrossRef]
43.
Nilsson, J. Organisational principles for cooperative ﬁrms. Scand. J. Manag. 2001, 17, 329–356. [CrossRef]
44.
Scholz, T. PLATFORM COOPERATIVISM: Challenging the Corporate Sharing Economy; Rosa Luxemburg Stiftung: Berlin, Ger-
many, 2016; Available online: https://eticasfoundation.org/wp-content/uploads/2019/03/Scholz_Platform-Cooperativism.pdf
(accessed on 14 October 2022).
45.
Menzani, T.; Zamagni, V. Cooperative Networks in the Italian Economy. Enterp. Soc. 2010, 11, 98–127. [CrossRef]
46.
Jossa, B. La Teoria Economica delle Cooperative di Produzione e la Possibile Fine del Capitalismo, 1st ed.; Giappichelli: Torino, Italy, 2005;
Volume 1.
47.
Dahl, R.A. Democracy and Its Critics; Yale University Press: New Heaven, CT, USA, 1989.
48.
Bakaikoa, B.; Errasti, A.; Begiristain, A. Gobierno y democracia en los grupos empresariales cooperativos ante la globalización.
CIRIEC-España 2004, 48, 53–77.
49.
Osti, G. Green social cooperatives in Italy: A practical way to cover the three pillars of sustainability? Sustain. Sci. Pract. Policy
2012, 8, 82–93. [CrossRef]
50.
Neef, M.M. The Cooperative Enterprise: A Valid Alternative for a More Balanced Society. In Cooperatives in a Post-Growth Era
Creating Cooperative Economics; Novkovic, S., Webb, T., Eds.; Zed Books: London, UK, 2014; pp. 15–39.
51.
Goodwin, N. The Cooperative Enterprise: A Valid Alternative for a More Balanced Society. In Cooperatives in a Post-Growth Era
Creating Cooperative Economics; Novkovic, S., Webb, T., Eds.; Zed Books: London, UK, 2014; pp. 39–61.
52.
Van Der Have, R.P.; Rubalcaba, L. Social innovation research: An emerging area of innovation studies? Res. Policy 2016, 45,
1923–1935. [CrossRef]
53.
Sci2 Team. Science of Science (Sci2) Tool. Indiana University and SciTech Strategies. 2019. Available online: https://sci2.cns.iu.edu
(accessed on 29 October 2023).
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
26 of 27
54.
Bergh, D.D.; Boyd, B.; Byron, K.; Gove, S.; Ketchen, D.J. What constitutes a methodological contribution? J. Manag. 2022, 48,
1835–1848. [CrossRef]
55.
Donthu, N.; Kumar, S.; Mukherjee, D.; Pandey, N.; Lim, W.M. How to conduct a bibliometric analysis: An overview and
guidelines. J. Bus. Res. 2021, 133, 285–296. [CrossRef]
56.
Díaz López, F.J.; Montalvo, C. A comprehensive review of the evolving and cumulative nature of eco-innovation in the chemical
industry. J. Clean. Prod. 2015, 102, 30–43. [CrossRef]
57.
Rivera Delgado, D.; Díaz López, F.J.; Carrillo González, G. Energy transition, innovation, and direct uses of geothermal energy in
Mexico: A thematic modeling analysis. Probl. Del Desarro. 2021, 52, 115–141.
58.
Lumivero. NVivo (Version 14). 2023. Available online: www.lumivero.com (accessed on 29 October 2023).
59.
Page, M.J.; McKenzie, J.E.; Bossuyt, P.M.; Boutron, I.; Hoffmann, T.; Mulrow, C.D.; Shamseer, L.; Tetzlaff, J.; Akl, E.A.; Brennan,
S.E.; et al. The PRISMA 2020 statement: An updated guideline for reporting systematic reviews. BMJ 2021, 88, 105906. [CrossRef]
60.
Aria, M.; Cuccurullo, C. Bibliometrix: An R-tool for comprehensive science mapping analysis. J. Informetr. 2017, 11, 959–975.
[CrossRef]
61.
R Core Team. R: A Language and Environment for Statistical Computing; R Foundation for Statistical Computing: Vienna, Austria,
2022; Available online: https://www.R-project.org/ (accessed on 29 October 2023).
62.
Cheng, P.; Zhang, G.; Sun, H. The Sustainable Supply Chain Network Competition Based on Non-Cooperative Equilibrium under
Carbon Emission Permits. Mathematics 2022, 10, 1364. [CrossRef]
63.
Campagnaro, C.; D’Urzo, M. Social Cooperation as a Driver for a Social and Solidarity Focused Approach to the Circular Economy.
Sustainability 2021, 13, 10145. [CrossRef]
64.
EEA. Circular Economy in Europe; European Environment Agency: Copenhagen, Denmark, 2016; Available online: https:
//www.eea.europa.eu/publications/circular-economy-in-europe/download (accessed on 24 October 2023).
65.
Elia, V.; Gnoni, M.G.; Tornese, F. Measuring circular economy strategies through index methods: A critical analysis. J. Clean. Prod.
2017, 142, 2741–2751. [CrossRef]
66.
Boyer, R.H.; Hunka, A.D.; Linder, M.; Whalen, K.A.; Habibi, S. Product Labels for the Circular Economy: Are Customers Willing
to Pay for Circular? Sustain. Prod. Consum. 2021, 27, 61–71. [CrossRef]
67.
Buch, R.; Marseille, A.; Williams, M.; Aggarwal, R.; Sharma, A. From Waste Pickers to Producers: An Inclusive Circular Economy
Solution through Development of Cooperatives in Waste Management. Sustainability 2021, 13, 8925. [CrossRef]
68.
Miranda IT, P.; Fidelis, R.; de Souza Fidelis, D.A.; Pilatti, L.A.; Picinin, C.T. The Integration of Recycling Cooperatives in the Formal
Management of Municipal Solid Waste as a Strategy for the Circular Economy—The Case of Londrina, Brazil. Sustainability 2020,
12, 10513. [CrossRef]
69.
Łe¸kawska-Andrinopoulou, L.; Tsimiklis, G.; Leick, S.; Moreno Nicolás, M.; Amditis, A. Circular Economy Matchmaking
Framework for Future Marketplace Deployment. Sustainability 2021, 13, 5668. [CrossRef]
70.
Lange, K.; Korevaar, G.; Nikolic, I.; Herder, P. Actor Behaviour and Robustness of Industrial Symbiosis Networks: An Agent-Based
Modelling Approach. J. Artif. Soc. Soc. Simul. 2021, 24, 8. [CrossRef]
71.
Becerra, L.; Carenzo, S.; Juarez, P. When Circular Economy Meets Inclusive Development. Insights from Urban Recycling and
Rural Water Access in Argentina. Sustainability 2020, 12, 9809. [CrossRef]
72.
Jones, S. Waste Management in Australia Is an Environmental Crisis: What Needs to Change so Adaptive Governance Can Help?
Sustainability 2020, 12, 9212. [CrossRef]
73.
Yazan, D.M.; Yazdanpanah, V.; Fraccascia, L. Learning strategic cooperative behavior in industrial symbiosis: A game-theoretic
approach integrated with agent-based simulation. Bus. Strategy Environ. 2020, 29, 2078–2091. [CrossRef]
74.
Sellitto, M.A.; Almeida FA, D. Strategies for value recovery from industrial waste: Case studies of six industries from Brazil.
Benchmarking Int. J. 2019, 27, 867–885. [CrossRef]
75.
Herczeg, G.; Akkerman, R.; Hauschild, M.Z. Supply chain collaboration in industrial symbiosis networks. J. Clean. Prod. 2018,
171, 1058–1067. [CrossRef]
76.
Mulrow, J.S.; Derrible, S.; Ashton, W.S.; Chopra, S.S. Industrial Symbiosis at the Facility Scale. J. Ind. Ecol. 2017, 21, 559–571.
[CrossRef]
77.
Fogarassy, C.; Horvath, B.; Kovacs, A.; Szoke, L.; Takacs-Gyorgy, K. A Circular Evaluation Tool for Sustainable Event
Management—An Olympic Case Study. Acta Polytech. Hung. 2018, 14, 161–177. [CrossRef]
78.
Ada, E.; Sagnak, M.; Uzel, R.A.; Balcıo˘glu, R. Analysis of barriers to circularity for agricultural cooperatives in the digitalization
era. Int. J. Product. Perform. Manag. 2021, 71, 932–951. [CrossRef]
79.
Mercado-Caruso, N.; Segarra-Oña, M.; Peiró-Signes, N.; Portnoy, I.; Navarro, E. Drivers of Eco-innovation in Industrial Clusters—
A Case Study in the Colombian Metalworking Sector. In Computer Information Systems and Industrial Management; Springer:
Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2022; pp. 136–145. [CrossRef]
80.
Rabadán, A.; Triguero, N.; Gonzalez-Moreno, N. Cooperation as the Secret Ingredient in the Recipe to Foster Internal Technological
Eco-Innovation in the Agri-Food Industry. Int. J. Environ. Res. Public Health 2020, 17, 2588. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
81.
Rabadán, A.; González-Moreno, N.; Sáez-Martínez, F.J. Improving Firms’ Performance and Sustainability: The Case of Eco-
Innovation in the Agri-Food Industry. Sustainability 2019, 11, 5590. [CrossRef]
82.
Rennings, K. Redeﬁning innovation—Eco-innovation research and the contribution from ecological economics. Ecol. Econ. 2000,
32, 319–332. [CrossRef]
Sustainability 2023, 15, 15595
27 of 27
83.
Van Es, J.C.; Pampel, F.C. Environmental practices: New strategies needed. J. Ext. 1976, 19, 10–15.
84.
Hamburg, I.; Vlădu¸t, G.; O’Brien, E. Fostering eco-innovation in SMEs through bridging research, education and industry for
building a business oriented model. In Proceedings of the International Conference on Business Excellence, Bucharest, Romania,
30–31 March 2017; Volume 11, pp. 1050–1057. [CrossRef]
85.
Guerreschi, A.; Piras, L.; Heck, F. Barriers to Efﬁcient Knowledge Transfer for a Holistic Circular Economy: Insights towards
Green Job Developments and Training for Young Professionals. Youth 2023, 3, 553–578. [CrossRef]
86.
Mathews, J.A.; Tan, H. Circular economy: Lessons from China. Nature 2016, 531, 440–442. [CrossRef]
87.
Carini, C.; Borzaga, C.; Carpita, M. Case Studies on Brazil, Canada, Colombia, the Philippines, the Russian Federation, the United
Kingdom; ILO: Geneva, Switzerland, 2017.
88.
European Commission. Paris Agreement: Climate Action. 2015. Available online: https://climate.ec.europa.eu/eu-action/
international-action-climate-change/climate-negotiations/paris-agreement_en#:~:text=The%20Paris%20Agreement%20sets%
20out,support%20them%20in%20their%20efforts (accessed on 15 September 2022).
89.
United Nations. International Day of Cooperatives 2020: COOPS 4 Climate Action|Division for Inclusive Social Development
(DISD). United Nations: Department of Economic and Social Affairs Social Inclusion. 4 July 2020. Available online: https:
//social.desa.un.org/issues/cooperatives/events/international-day-of-cooperatives-2020-coops-4-climate-action (accessed on
15 September 2022).
90.
Jelinski, L.W.; Graedel, T.E.; Laudise, R.A.; McCall, D.W.; Patel, C.K. Industrial ecology: Concepts and approaches. Proc. Natl.
Acad. Sci. USA 1992, 89, 793–797. [CrossRef]
91.
Kemp, R.; Arundel, A.; Rammer, C.; Miedzinski, M.; Tapia, C.; Barbieri, N.; Türkeli, S.; Bassi, A.; Mazzanti, M.; Chapman, D.; et al.
Measuring eco-innovation for a green economy. Sustainability 2019, 66, 391–404.
92.
Lau, J.C.-H. Towards a care perspective on waste: A new direction in discard studies. Environ. Plan. C Politics Space 2022,
23996544211063383. [CrossRef]
93.
Gille, Z. From the Cult of Waste to the Trash Heap of History: The Politics of Waste in Socialist and Postsocialist Hungary; Indiana
University Press: Bloomington, IN, USA, 2017.
94.
Radhakrishnan, S.; Erbis, S.; Isaacs, J.A.; Kamarthi, S. Correction: Novel keyword co-occurrence network-based methods to foster
systematic reviews of scientiﬁc literature. PLoS ONE 2017, 12, e0185771. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
95.
Clarivate. KeyWords Plus Generation, Creation, and Changes. 9 June 2022. Available online: https://support.clarivate.com/s/
article/KeyWords-Plus-generation-creation-and-changes?language=en_US (accessed on 29 June 2023).
96.
Kirchherr, J.; Urbinati, A.; Hartley, K. Circular economy: A new research ﬁeld? J. Ind. Ecol. 2023, 27, 1239–1251. [CrossRef]
97.
Savaget, P.; Carvalho, F. Investigating the Regulatory-Push of Eco-innovations in Brazilian Companies. Sustain. Des. Manuf. 2016,
2016, 27–37. [CrossRef]
98.
Giagnocavo, C. Caring for the Environment and ICA principles. In Proceedings of the ICA CCR European Research Conference
2022 “Rethinking Cooperatives: From Local to Global and from the Past to the Future”, Athens, Greece, 14 July 2022.
99.
Diamantopoulos, M. Bridging co-operation’s communication gap: The Statement on the Cooperative Identity, the sociology of
cooperative education’s shifting terrain, and the problem of public opinion. J. Coop. Organ. Manag. 2022, 10, 100161. [CrossRef]
100. Novkovic, S.N. Circular Economy in Cooperatives. In Proceedings of the Global Innovation Coop Summit 2023 Edition, Montreal,
QC, Canada, 27–29 September 2023.
Disclaimer/Publisher’s Note: The statements, opinions and data contained in all publications are solely those of the individual
author(s) and contributor(s) and not of MDPI and/or the editor(s). MDPI and/or the editor(s) disclaim responsibility for any injury to
people or property resulting from any ideas, methods, instructions or products referred to in the content.

